For those of you who are interested in learning how to make your own little tote check back tomorrow when I'll post the instructions.
We do not procrastinate. We must be exact. We want to tell the simple truth, cut and dried, as quickly as possible.
On Sunday 04 March of this year 2012, I went to my good old Local Card Shop (LCS) "House of Cards" in Downtown Silver Spring, MD. I don't get there as often as I should. I won't mention the Non-Curly W stuff I got, but the "Piece de Resistance" was a Washington Senators Scorecard Program from 1965 for $15.00 in fantastic condition for a 47 year old program. The white paper is only slightly yellowed (shows mostly on the back along the middle edge, good old 1960s glossy magazine pages..
don't talk yourself out of wearing one because it looks hard to knot. Ironically, you have been knotting bow ties all your life. Just take a quick glance at your leather oxfords. Exactly. The manner in which you lace your dress shoes is the same way you knot a bow tie. So instead of knotting a bow in your shoes laces, you are simply knotting a bow with a piece of silk. If the task still seems daunting, choose a portion of your leg that closely mimics the circumference of your neck. Now pretend that you are lacing your shoe. When you have overcome the mental block that it is a bow tie, you can steadily move on to your neck. See...knotting made simple.
The hostel we had booked was a lovely little place – Terrazas Estoril, that we had chosen on the net and also contrare to recommendations. We’d figured that with a total of five nights in Buenos Aires and so much to see that we would try and stay out of harms way and have a few quiet nights to begin with. The Staff at Terrazas Estoril were awesome and only to happy to help (one of them managed to saw off the padlock on the locker when I lost my keys!). Our first mission when we arrived in BA, besides getting to our hostel safely, was to find Sonya a new camera and me a memory card. Surprise, I had left the memory card on my desk at work…
He was by then stark naked, his clothes in an untidy heap beside him on the stones. He would have liked to take a running jump into the water but for all he knew he might land in a tangle of rusty submerged barbed wire. And as for running, it took a moment or two to get used to walking barefoot on the rough stones. He walked straight in.
KEY TO VICTORY: FINDING AL SHEBAB UNITS
Ok so we all loved S-Club 7 back in the late 1990′s to the early 2000′s and to be fair they were successful and right for the music of the time. It made me cringe slightly when I saw that they were due to re-unite this summer for a tour and for two brand new albums. S Club 7 achieved four UK number one singles, a number one album and over 17 million record sales worldwide during their five-year stint.
we dream
3) add instant custard with cream
Stray dogs make their way to the back of butcher shops
After the album was completed the search for a label started and Amputated gave us the best offer so we signed there.
.: A heart is a fragile thing, that’s why we protect them so vigorously, give them away so rarely, and why it means so much when we do. Some hearts are more fragile than others, purer somehow. Like crystal in a world of glass. Even the way they shatter is beautiful :.
Gary Griffith is really the Minister of Natl Security
Assassin's Creed has always been quite close to my heart. Being of the games I really enjoy fooling around with. As the series progressed it became easy, easier and super ezmode. Playing Revelations, comparing it with the first game, is that it's more diverse but it also makes it easy. Right from get go, once you can sell bomb components you can practically buy the entirety of Constantinople (or Istanbul, whatever) without much effort. The only thing that really peeves me off are the Den Defense missions, they are incredibly boring from my perspective, the only reason for actually doing them though is the challenges requires 3 successful den defense.
Typically the term “beer goggles” is most associated with a condition that overindulgent males suffer from. But wondering minds and bar patrons want to know, do women suffer the same fate? To test this myth a study conducted by researchers at London’s Roehampton University involved more than 100 men and women in which they rate pairs of faces. Some were given beverages containing alcohol and others were given drinks without alcohol. The premise of the study was to have the study participants identify which faces were symmetrical and which were asymmetrical. Apparently symmetry is one of the major traits we use to measure the attractiveness of one person compared to another (I guess if you listen to those fancy mind doctors). Based on the results women were particularly bad at discerning between symmetrical and asymmetrical faces after consuming alcohol. There were no statistics given so I’m not sure how decisively the intoxicated women failed the symmetry test.
From the origins of detective noir to the latest modern iteration, McBride’s Frank Sinatra in a Blender is violent, gruesome, black and about as far away from The Big Sleep as you can get, while still clearly being its literary descendent. It’s noir and as hardboiled as you can get – McBride’s prose has the same rhythm and poetry of the originals of the genre, and, as with The Big Sleep, you know you’re in for something special right from the opening lines. Actually, you know you’re in for something special right from the title.
We’ve seen your ugly race pictures. But I want to see your favorite race picture! And an explanation of why. It can be ugly or pretty, solo or with a friend or group … whatever reason, as long as it’s your favorite. Oh my. I have to choose a favorite race photo? Strangely, I don’t have a lot of ugly race photos. Actually, there are probably ugly ones out there of me (I can think of one in particular from the Soldier Field 10 Mile where my form is horrific) but I haven’t saved any of them. For good reason.
Now it's time for you to hop on. Your next stop is Lils' blog! Thanks for playing along in our release hop and don't forget to leave your comments on each stop of the hop to be eligible for all the prizes!!! Have fun and good luck to all!
Some more work has gotten done in the flower gardens around the pool. (And in the veggie garden!)
Camp Merryelande is a family oriented place offering nice modern beach cottages and campgrounds. All our cottages are on the beach or have nice views of the beach and river. They are modern and come with WIFI, satellite TV, full kitchens including microwaves and coffee makers. For walk-in guests who don’t plan to stay Friday night, the Main event is on Saturday, August 11. But those who are making camping or cottage reservations are encouraged to join us and relax on the beach Friday night, August 10 as well.
If stories transmitted through myth in all ancient cultures are taken as genuine records of visual phenomena –plasma bursts in the heavens– we begin to see formative earth peoples experiencing life on a volatile planet among cataclysmic prehistoric events happening in their skies. Our recent past, by comparison, has been a peaceful one. We can imagine how such events must have instilled fear, but faith and belief that their leaders (god-kings in ancient Egypt, China, Babylon) could and did overcome such monsters is not in our makeup. By ignoring the heavens, we have become complacent: we are no longer skywatchers. Because our history relates few cosmic incidents, we are lulled into ignoring our unique connection to our star, its orbiting companions, the Milky Way galaxy which drives us and the great space of infinity beyond.
Most of the action, thus far, as taken place online in our first online readalong but the live events have started, wtih a presentation on how the original railroad bridges went from rail to trail (many of them are now part of a state park called the Overseas Heritage Trail) and a special guided tour of the Speedway to Sunshine exhibit at the Custom House (there’s another this Friday — you can still sign up by coming into the library or calling there at 305-292-3595).
www.accrispin.com
1089. Red Velvet Whoopie Pie @ the Mundy Estate (Charlotte, NC)
I give to you not only a mighty playlist of bitchin' grooves, but also some homespun album artwork courtesy Retrospace. This time 'round we've got a bunch of songs with one thing in common: all have the word "circle" in the title. Have no fear, Elton John's "Circle of Life" is nowhere to be found on this mix tape. Not only would that be an unforgivable affront to good taste, but I would also expect Disney lawyers to Kaiser Sosa my ass within five minutes of this posting.
It’s another piece of advice I’m giving out to the world that I should be following myself. I stopped writing a while ago (December? ONLY December? It feels like a lifetime!) and have been trying to get back into it for about a month now.
Since there was a good range in print size, the quality spectrum was also greatly varied. Those photographs with minimal post production had the best results, producing sharp, full tone range prints. This is mostly due to the manipulation of digital pixel, causing a softer edge and generally a more muted look.
Garry Hornby, University of Canterbury, New Zealand.
The chief went back to his people and told them to collect even more firewood in order to be prepared. A week later he called the national weather service. "Does it still look like it's going to be a very cold winter?"
78. Magician - Raymond E Feist
Scott Hamilton / Alex Wild, Blogging, and the Curse of Coolness / 213
The last verse in Ch 6 presents the great missiological challenge of all time…”How will I get Pharoah (those without a reference point with God) to listen to me?” (6:30). The question is not how to get a powerful God to save…or how to get a powerful God to desire to save. God is all-powerful and His heart/desire to save is already demonstrated (Jn 3:16/Rom 5:8, et.al.) The question is how do we communicate the message in such a way that it is understood and adhered to?
Heidi’s Egg and Cheese Bake is love in a 13×9 pan.
I am not really sure what this thing is called or when it was built exactly, so I am just calling it "Rotunda." This sits in the middle of parque central and is used in the evenings and weekends as a meet up/hang out point for Quetzaltenango's young people to chat, make out, and breakdance--just as I am sure the original Greek fetishing architects envisioned.
How to Buy a HD Flat Screen TV
o Once you know, communicate as soon as possible. People need information to take back control and plan for their personal situation.
For me, it was so nice to focus on such a large goal that was bigger than myself. I had a good race and raised over $7300 for a cause that just kept getting more amazing the more I learned about it … on a side note, just because the marathon’s over does not mean that cancer stops! There is still time to donate! Please go to my fundraising page to learn more about innovative cancer research at Dana-Farber Cancer Institute.
But I am starving.
First up...
Micheals ribbon
It filled her with love;
Imagine an invading army defeating and occupying Britain. Imagine their soldiers raping and murdering the British people. Imagine the foreign-led quisling police force ignoring the rapes and murders. Imagine the Vichy government and media covering up the details and promoting a two-minute hate campaign against the British resistance hiding out in the hills.
Bowden has promised fans that he plans on bringing the character to life with a maximum amount of honesty to the original.
I take him around the house, or rather up and down the house. It’s a sunny day and it looks nice; everything looks nice on a day like today. We tramp up the staircase, exchanging pleasantries, inasmuch as a smartly-dressed businessman and a hairy childcarer can trade their thoughts. We soon find ourselves standing in uncomfortable proximity at the top of the house.
Preheat oven to 375 degrees F.
Unfortunately, purging only reinforces binge eating. Though you may tell yourself, as you launch into a new diet, that this is the last time, in the back of your mind there’s a voice telling you that you can always throw up or use laxatives if you lose control again. What you may not realize is that purging doesn’t come close to wiping the slate clean after a binge.
Two items for class today:
Isadora bit her tongue to prevent anything slipping out that might ruin their time. She watched Trevor savor his buffalo.
-1 Mage Cloth - dropped by Sizar Mages and other mages in first floor of Thenton Tower (but Sizar Mages I've actually seen most often). You can also buy them in AvLynyss Item Shop for 40,000 gold.
In weaker veins shall run.
reported to have been shot in front of his wife and children at point
Now you have a chance to win an amazing prize pack from Wilton! The prize pack will include:
“What? Tell us what? Out with it, man.” Edward removed his leather gloves and gripped them in one hand.
Is what Andrew said to me when I asked him why it's taking so long to bake this baby, and I was this close to yelling, "WELL WE BOTH KNOW WHOSE HOT DOG IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THIS."
Next, add the rice, salt, curry powder, mustard powder, parsley, ground black pepper and almonds. Allow all the ingredients to heat through and then pour in the half-and-half. Let the soup gently simmer for about 1 hour, stirring occasionally to prevent sticking. The soup should not boil but should simmer over low heat so that it thickens slowly.
18 He that believeth on the Son is not condemned; but he that believeth not is condemned already, because he hath not believed in the Name of the Only Begotten Son of God.
Paper: GP white, Bazzill basics REDS
well, that's how i learned that when it comes to certain things, this guy is NOT the average! he's blazing right on past the normal milestone markers and has decided he's gonna do things his own way! i knew we were in trouble when, before he turned six months, he started pulling himself up to stand using the spindles of his crib when he was supposed to be sleeping... the little snot! *wink*
He tries to move on, going for new friends, a new school, and a new job, but all his changes can’t make him forget what he left behind—his mother, who is still trapped with his dad, and his ex-girlfriend, who is keeping his secret.
So how do we make sure all the essentials are met? Well first off if you are working in an essential service you will get the better holidays/working hours as discussed but for things like food and what we call consumer items how do we make sure this is dealt with sanely? Well there is the option of setting limits on what is reasonably expected an average human in your position needs of any given thing, such as no-one needs more than 5 loaves of bread a day or 5 working TVs at any one time or something like that. People can get different kinds of allowances for different things, such as essential allowances to cover the basics that everyone gets and then health allowance for special needs and work allowance for things you need in order to carry out your job and these would be assessed individually based on the position you hold, but should never be excessive.
"We're going to miss our flight," Josh nearly shouted at the man. "I'll sit down if you tell me that you know where we're going."
Kung Fu Panda Holiday Special ... ABC Family ... 11 AM
All this ‘fictional, ‘filmy’ blah blah is fine, but where the film actually scores ‘flat-out brilliance’ points is the entire Abraham (Emraan) and Silk (Vidya) thread. Though a tad under-developed, it was so refreshing to see such a man-woman equation in a hindi movie. As I mentioned earlier, all the elements of this equation, like male-insecurity, jealousy, craving for the ‘prohibited’, are all there in the dialogues. Maybe you can say its less ‘showing’ more ‘telling’, but Emraan and Vidya, both have such scorching screen presence that when dialogues are delivered they work like fireworks celebrating the very existence of ‘dialogue-baazi’ in our movies. If both would’ve just exchanged looks without the dialogues the screen would’ve been trembling, but when you can burn the screen with the dialogues why would you wont use them.
I started off with, of course, Pool Party card stock cut at 5-1/2" x 8-1/2" and scored it at 4-1/4". Next I cut a piece of Whisper White card stock 4" x 5-1/2". I stamped the doily from Hello Doily onto the Whisper White card stock in Pool Party ink and adhered the card stock onto the card front.
While that’s going on, you make quinoa. (I confess, I always screw up quinoa. I don’t know why. The package says one cup quinoa to two cups of water, which is what I did, but still it ended up a bit mushy.)
Stampin Up- Flight of the Butterfly
However, Iblis plays a much smaller role in Islamic theology (and I’d guess, anecdotally, Islamic literature) than the Devil in the Christian tradition, and is most often portrayed as appearing in human guise on earth to teach wrong beliefs – so, for example, many early Islamic heresiographies (books of heresy) record the founder of particularly extreme sects as being Iblis himself, who appeared in human form to teach the members of the movement wrong beliefs. There is still an idea of Iblis as corrupting humanity, like the Devil in Christianity, but Iblis does this in a much more practical, much less supernatural way, again usually by talking to people and manipulating their teaching.
When we call for freedom and democracy, then by default, we stand with Israel. When we call for truth and honesty with regard to Islam, then we stand with Israel. When we call for bravery, determination and sacrifice in our struggle against Islam then we stand with Israel. When we call for the right to free speech and the right to a peaceful existence, then we stand with Israel.
By Christof Lehmann – Aarhus – nsnbc. Yesterday the Danish City of Aarhus became the focus and meeting point of the European Right, including the English Defense League, the Danish Defense League, and right-wing to fascist organizations from Finland, Poland, Russia, Germany and other European nations. It is likely that the right wing meeting can be considered as a seminal event for gathering the European Right under a common program. The meeting was outnumbered by the biggest demonstration in Aarhus since 2006, with approximately 5.000 people marching through the city, shouting slogans like “No fascism in our streets – Make Place for Everybody who makes Place for Everybody“, and most prominently “Aarhus for Diversity“.
frequency..in another vibrational time
As you read this, I am cruising around the Eastern Caribbean with the crazy bead ladies taking part in The Bead Cruise. The travel agent putting on The Bead Cruise is an agency called Memory Cruisin'. I thought it would be fun to take a spin off that memory theme and take a stroll down memory lane here on the blog. Can you believe I've been blogging for more than 7, SEVEN, years?!? Wild isn't it? All week you'll find a blast from the past post. Who doesn't like to get a little sentimental?
Don't you just love life's little surprises? :) Have a fantastic weekend!
Liz, sandwich spotter from above, brought back this great mud from her vacation in Lake Chapala, Mexico. After one holiday shindig died down, Jennifer and I decided to beautify ourselves. And Bill, we decided to beautify Bill. Here is is, crying "noooooo!"
It just goes to show that the best defense is still a good offense.
What can you do with banjo
May you always know the truth
The skies above are clear again
Tine vs. The Berger....goes to Tine. These are phenomenal treats but I realize the danger they pose. I am willing to run the extra two miles just to indulge in two of these scrumptious delicacies. The Berger is definitely something every Marylander should experience, but heed my warning...just buy one pack at a time. At 140 calories a pop, they are a spare tire just waiting to happen.
St. Patrick’s Day was celebrated on March 17 and in Suffolk County, St. Paddy’s Day is a very big deal. There is a huge parade, bakeries sell Irish soda bread throughout the month (it’s great toasted and slathered with lots of butter), bars sell green beer and some grocery stores even sell green bagels. The city declares a holiday (officially called Evacuation Day) and the parking meters are off.
Gwyneth
As I found out late in October, the leaf peeping season is a couple or so weeks away from its peak. But I already drove the 250 miles to get to my leaf peeping spot and by hook or by crook I was going to get me some fall color shots.
DJ’s Khomza, Voqul and YFM’s MS Cosmo kept us on our feet, whilst some were just getting down to the core. I actually feel the technical clichés issue is becoming a habit mo Kasi, but I’m also assuming there isn’t much that can be done about it. Is it really inevitable? Can it be somehow reduced? Something most promoters have to look at. But focusing on the positive it really was a good night and I enjoyed myself.
Even when I do a mistake, everyone says “there there” and showers me with affection.
Being a morning person is key in this Savage World; that you are no longer just living in, but beginning to own!
The Mosque will be located at Park Heights and Slade Avenue, barely a block from the very epicenter of Jewish Baltimore. It will be across Slade Avenue from Baltimore Hebrew Congregation and its Day School – the very oldest Jewish congregation in Baltimore. It will be diagonal from Temple Oheb Shalom, whose sanctuary was designed by the great architect Walter Gropius. Across Park Heights Avenue will be the Suburban Club, a 100 year old Jewish country club. Within a mile of it will be Chizuk Amuno Congregation and my ‘almamater’, the Krieger Schechter Day School which it houses, Beth Tfiloh Congregation and its day school, and Beth El Congregation. Those are three of the world’s largest synagogues. Within a mile and a half is the Seven Mile Market, which recently expanded to become the single largest kosher supermarket in the world. Within a two mile radius will be dozens and dozens of small orthodox congregations, dozens of Jewish retirement homes, the Ner Israel Yeshiva, Sol Levinson & Brothers Funeral Home, Sinai Hospital, The Suburban House, Lenny’s and Miller’s Delis, and roughly ten kosher restaurants. It is a Mosque located at the absolute center of Jewish Baltimore. For nearly half a century, no new church dared open its doors near Upper Park Heights Avenue for the knowledge that that attracting new membership would be a fool’s errand. It is perhaps the sole place in America whose commercial districts are guaranteed not to have Christmas decorations in the winter.
I went to bed that night feeling very calm and accepting.
Yes it is rare to find a full British menu in Australia. So this is an absolute delight to the Aussie pallette.
And on Friday, Hilary celebrates a naive painter and his unlikely influence on a generation of English artists, in Alfred Wallis, Artist and Mariner, by Robert Jones.
Now here we are! What my mother taught me is not true. The rejection of my marriage and children by my black in-laws, and the complete destruction of our entire extended family by divorce, has helped me to turn inward to my immediate family in order to protect them. I realized at some point that I was on a mission placed before me and that I had a job to do. We have been led, I believe by God, into a new way of thinking. Since last year, we have turned 180 degrees politically, and have adopted very conservative values. We have lost all of our liberal friends in the process, but have strengthened our family in many ways. We have become religious and very concerned with the future of our country.
"If a serving senior Federal Court judge who presided in Teoh's RCI can be ignored by the AG, then what is the weight of the recommendations by Hanif (left) or Shim to him?"
This job was pretty good. I enjoyed what I was doing, the people in the office were pretty great (and the back office, where I was, was very small. 4 people, and we all got along pretty well. BONUS!) Other than spelling the receptionist for her lunch and breaks, I didn’t have to deal with anyone outside the office, and the pay plus benefits were rather awesome! We even had a rotation of 4/10 day workdays – each week, one of the back office people would work Mon. – Thurs., with Friday off, so that we could take care of things like Dr. appointments, or shopping, or just lazing on a three day weekend.
The Design Team have some examples for you:-
Editors Note: This week’s “Two-Minute Warning” is hosted by John Stonestreet and Timothy George. Next week, Chuck Colson’s pre-recorded broadcast on the cardinal virtues starts. In total, we have an eight-part series, four of which Chuck recorded.
We've thought about acquiring horses and making a go of it, but we live on a .15-acre (that's POINT 15 acre) lot in a homeowners association that doesn't allow small farmyard animals, let alone hay-burning, manure-making modes of transport. Paying someone else to allow us to keep horses inconveniently away from our home doesn't make sense. Plus, we have nowhere here to store a trailer or other matters horse related. (No trailer parking in the street OR in our own driveway, and our side yards are so narrow there's no way a trailer of ANY description can be hidden behind the side fences. I can barely get our trash can to fit through the gate on garbage day.)
Click on the link below to see Red's blog post (in Japanese) on Bailey's Taproom, which he calls downtown Portland's best beer bar: ダウンタウン・ポートランドのベスト・ビール・バー
Hercules loved nothing more than to run through fields and forests, or to plunge for a cooling dip into a lake or river. Spring through autumn were his seasons. He never grew accustomed to winter, being prone to ice buildup in his paws, and our only attempt to fit him with booties provided some despairing looks and an exaggerated clown walk.
Knowing what I’m supposed to do,
Let him have your submerged treasure
sex: Female
UK Gold Limited, operator of the ‘Dave’ comedy TV channel, applied to register the word mark DAVE as a Community trade mark (CTM) for goods and services in classes 9, 16, 28, 35, 38, and 41. Of these, classes 38 and 41 would appear to be the most crucial for UK Gold's business, given they include ‘broadcasting’ and ‘organization, production, presentation, distribution, syndication, and rental of television programmes’. The filing date of the application was 18 July 2007.
Mini tennis balls
Why, then, do I feel so uneasy about this push for Literacy, targeted directly at our boys?
This was clear with the death of my sister Christine. After viewing her body at the hospital, I went out to speak with family members. Christine’s husband – Ed – started to sob uncontrollably. For a few moments I felt like I was transcending the provincialism of time. I thought about the 20-watts of energy, and about experiments that show a single particle can pass through two holes at the same time. I could not dismiss the conclusion: Christine was both alive and dead, outside of time.
“You knew what to look for,” he said quietly.
Status: On hold at the the library, #2 in the queue.
I haven't stressed too much this week about making too many things. But I love creating so I made these two Roman rag doll cuties.
11-I can only change myself
“… spirit element has always existed; it is co-eternal with God…. It is also called intelligence…. portions of the self-existent spirit element are born as spirit children, or in other words… is organized into intelligences” (Mormon Doctrine, 1977 ed., p. 751).
I used some scrap Brilliant Blue CS and matching DP. I coloured the kitty with copics and added some rhinestones & ribbon! I love making projects like this - they make me feel like I'm not "wasting" paper! When I can use up the GAZILLION scraps I have, I feel better!!!! LOL
She tried to relax, to remember the sensation when Kinn and Fenne had been playing their music, tried to recapture that instant when the music had changed into something different, deeper. Still music, still present, but quiet as an in-held breath, expectant, interwoven with wonder. . . .
“But that’s how cats are, Letizia!”
So let us review the specifications, payment mode & transparency in procuring the laptops.
512-406-1157 cell
I think there is a spectrum in the way we view God’s guidelines. On one side, we view them as restrictive rules that don’t bring freedom and peace. We resent them, refuse to acknowledge them and resist anyone who tries to call us to the table when we aren’t following them. At times on this spectrum, we are afraid to tell anyone about them because we see them as a negative in our own lives. We don’t see the freedom and therefore we don’t feel there is anything positive to share. We hate the guidelines and can’t understand their propose. This is a heart issue. On the other side of the spectrum, we focus on guidelines so much that we can’t live life. We tell everybody about the guidelines and turn people off because we aren’t focused on the outcome, but rather the guideline itself. We live a life that is restrictive and speak of our martyrdom; we resist anyone who speaks of freedom. The difference on this side is that we acknowledge the rules, and make them a huge part of our lives. However, the similarity is that we aren’t living in communion with God because if we were, we wouldn’t be on either end of the spectrum. There would be a healthy understanding of the guidelines and an inward and outward gratitude for the freedom the bring. Neither of these ends of the spectrum are healthy our what God has intended. As I said before, God intends these guidelines to bring freedom and enhance our lives. It is an issue of the heart and maturity when we find ourselves not in the middle of the spectrum, which is in a committed relationship with Christ.
The hardest part is recording your own voice without cringing at the result. The second hardest is gently underlining how the English "eat their words" without going at a wholly natural speed. These are a bit of a fiddle to make at the beginning, but I find I can knock them out in half an hour flat now including finding images and making the vids.
Moreover, the regular influx of Tibetans has resulted in the disappearance of the racial characteristics of ‘Dards’, the original Indo-Aryan inhabitants of Ladakh. Most of its 200,000 large population, especially of eastern and central Ladakh, bears much resemblance to Tibetans and Central Asians. But who’s bothered?
Removes the intellectual causes of preoccupation blockage
Okay, it’s not quite like that. It’s EVEN BETTER. I’m currently the author of the world’s HIGHEST SELLING (free) ‘unicorn sharehousing comedy fantasy story featuring a protagonist called Stanley’, and don’t even try telling me that hasn’t been your dream since childhood.
Another thing I’d like to note before I continue: on March 31, I returned home from a mission trip to Guatemala with my church. After we landed, our pastor told us all that, being in Guatemala, we were ‘on a mountain’ and that the transition back home could put us ‘in a valley’, but God called us to follow Him on mountains and in valleys. So I think April 1st, I fell into my valley and I’m still waiting to get out. (I guess I need to thank Pastor Dave for preparing me for the valley I’d be stuck in for the month of April)
- JMD Pratza by kanu Mangotra in the food space
The beauty of God not treasured.
You’ll bruise yourself jumping to conclusions, but, hey, be my guest. Fortunately, your judgments as to my orthodoxy are simply that: your judgments.
The Whites who explored China were just as racist as those who explored Africa, but their descriptions were different from what they and the Arabs had written about Africans. In 1275 Marco Polo arrived in China from his native Italy to open trade with the Mongol Empire. He found that the Chinese had well built roads, bridges, cities connected by canals, census takers, markets, standardized weights and measures, and not only coins, but paper money as well. Even a postal system was in existence.
Paths vary;
I can justify it often though, because of the different covers. First of all, I hate the cliché 'don't judge a book by it's cover', because while I know that authors rarely have control over what actually ends up encasing their work, sometimes you just have to turn a book over because of the cover, staring up at you in strangely inconsistent oblivion. When I'm loafing around the bookstore 90% of the reason I pick up a random book for it's cover (the rest is the title), so you know, you have to judge a book by something, really.
"It's enough," Jack said, "But it's hard to understand without Watchtower study materials to interpret it."
According to a report in Israel Defense News, the new subs’ advanced Israeli “super secret” systems, once installed, will be comparable to those “found perhaps only in U.S. nuclear submarines.”
--750 new office jobs (30 percent of 2500).
Blackbird's Anniversaries of the Heart. It's quickly becoming a favorite! I ended up tea dying the fabric because it was too white and not very antique-y looking. I haven't put any special people in yet. I'm still collecting names and dates. I have a little book I keep with the charts and I add thoughts as I have them. Last night I was looking through some stitchy magazines for small symbols representing members of my family. I found a wonderful little photo of a karate kid which will be perfect for my grandson! This piece is so much fun to stitch.
90. Attend a comedy show
04. Wild Fire Willie
and racing a 10 year-old through the obstacle course. After that, we handed over the cleaning to younger, more energetic people...It's hard to say how clean things got, but they did race through there with spray bottles and rags...
8. Things you collect
It's my 30th birthday!
From ev'ry depth of good and ill
I have also used one of the Die-namics swirl die to cut out in pink card this has been stuck down the right handside, then I used some of the left over script paper with the Royal Rose rolled die from Die-namics cut it out then rolled it up and placed it at the top of the swirl. To finish of I have used 6 black pearls in two sizes down the left and right hand sides.
Jennifer trying to blow out all those candles
Haven’t done much chatting since my friend has not been around much this week. Been busy with other things. I rarely venture into any random chat rooms these days. I’m kind of happy just to visit one or two rooms on a regular basis. After all the years I’ve put into it I have started to feel like I’d want to do something else with my time. Sure it’s fun making new friends but there are also other aspects which are not as much fun.
I used to have a part-time job at a local Wendy’s here and I often grabbed kid’s meal freebies that looked interesting for one reason or another. I am not entirely sure why I grabbed these as I am not known to be a fan of monster trucks and yet here they are and still in the original packaging. From what I can glean from the internets it appears they came from a promotion in 2004.
obvious. “Attorning” means to take all of the property of the People
Happy May 1st.....
The Stooges – Have Some Fun: Live At Ungano’s
Dear Princess,
This will be a lawyers delight.
Besides the food there were souvenirs. All sorts of cheap touristy crap. There were Ulu knife sets for $3.99 – a very popular item in the group. From my two trips to Alaska I still didn’t buy those knives – just don’t know what to do with them. They may be ok as a souvenir to put on a shelf. Other than that I doubt I’ll ever use one as a real knife. But those $3.99 ones were made in China. I mean, seriously? In Alaska to buy traditional Ulu knife made in China (the box very explicitly stated that the set was designed in Alaska, but still). However, I did find a very nice jade bears explicitly labeled Made in Alaska, though a bit more expensive.
Well, he also consistently and publicly criticize those who are not member of a big domain called “kaibigan, inc.”
Q: How is the real world the enemy of the writer? What can we do about this?
For me? Not the easiest of tasks. But not impossible either. I will simply have to put forth some effort. But I can manage it. Hey...if I can give up my X-Box controllers for a week I think I can manage it. And I never even mentioned in the blog (was too busy playing X-Box, 'NATCH) that two weeks ago yesterday was my THREE YEAR ANNIVERSARY from having smoked my last cigarette. Ever.
When I opt for this option I don’t do anything about creating opportunities for myself which might give me a better future.
Vocally the real problems were the two leads though. Ellen Orford's music is extraordinarily beautiful in this opera, and requires an extremely good lyric soprano to do it justice. Amanda Roocroft is a magnificent actress as we've seen in her assumption of the Janacek heroines at ENO, but unfortunately vocal problems persist. She once had an extremely beautiful full lyric voice, and while it remains this in the warm middle voice, the top is strident and metallic, rather than blooming and full. The quiet top B flat in the Embroidery aria wasn't even attempted, instead she just stopped halfway through the interval and sang the line from where she stopped. Ben Heppner is well past his prime, and is completely beset by vocal problems - he can't sing quietly, all wide intervals are heavily scooped into, everywhere there are tuning issues, the top is extremely strained, the line bulges as he applies force about half a second into each note. Apparently he's doing Tristan with Stemme next month at the Bayerische Staatsoper - something to dread.
In Paradise he prays God give him rest,
So go get yourself a bottle of Barossa Valley wine for $30 or less; Shiraz, Chardonnay, Cabernet, Riesling or otherwise…and let everyone know on April 25 what you think about the ”return of the Barossa Boomerang”. Kindly use #wbw76 on all tweets and references. I will provide a recap here and at the Wine Blogging Wednesday site no more than a couple days following April 25. So be sure to tweet all your links, share all your stories, (include those hashtags everywhere) so we (appreciate the ongoing support of Tim Elliot and Lenn Thompson towards making #wbw76 fun and successsful) can help pass your experiences and content on to even more winos by including your stories in all the wrap-ups.
My dreams have been extra vivid lately. When I woke up I was able to draw out the floor plan for the house from my dream... so I did for kicks. xD We all have different ways we waste our time. ;)
So Corpus Christi may well have wished to forget that Marlowe existed. There is precedence for this too. Henry Butts, Corpus Christi master in 1632, worked heroically to relieve suffering during the plague, but later went insane. This was deemed ‘a disgrace’, and his portrait was taken down and hidden.
Photo by Resepi Diana
Have you joined the merry band of followers? Have you bookmarked the page? Have you become unruly on Facebook or joined the Unruly Yahoo Group? Lots of ways to stay in touch. Just visit the blog and you will see where to join up.
On the fourth Armenian Remembrance Day of his presidency, President Obama has for the fourth time in a row broken his promise to the Armenian community to use the word “genocide” in describing what happened at the hands of the Turks roughly a century ago.
The fun stuff!! I had my 22 week u/s with the MFM on 12/27 and everything looked amazing!! As soon as the tech put the probe on my belly we saw a penis! Again, my little boy clearly is not shy and is obviously a boy! She then went and found Baby A and although stubborn as usual, she was not being coy and she is absolutely a she! We saw the labia and no penis! That was about all she cooperated with as we couldn't get a good profile picture...we did get one of her cute little feet, though! And when they did the internal u/s to check my cervix length, all you could see was her kicking down there - brat! He was being good - we got a great profile picture and the tech turned on the 3D and we got to see him!!! I'll admit, it's a bit creepy and awesome all at the same time!
Minor League Update -
In conclusion, I need to learn to let go… that refers to the runs that I have missed, even if they are long runs, and start each week fresh. I also need to pay extra attention that I recover properly from each run. This means rigorous stretching, icing, elevating, sleeping in compression garments, nutrition. With uni, 12wbt and everything that’s currently going on in my life, I need to get organized. Planning is key to success, they say. Well, I drew up my fitness plan for March and nearly choked on my breakfast seeing how busy I will be the coming month. Yikes!
Sjora Crew:
Not to be deterred, climate alarmists insist that the climate is changing in new ways -- for example, in the "extreme weather" that has purportedly struck the U.S. since 2005. Focusing on Hurricane Katrina in that year and an outbreak of deadly tornadoes in 2011, alarmists contend that the weather is becoming more extreme and that climate change is the cause.
Joey’s not feeling so good. Maybe it was the ice-creams that did it.
I've decided that even I can do a better job than that, so friend of mine who has been a groomer, but now only does a few out of her home, has offered to teach me... gonna be getting my shears soon... but I think I have awhile before his hair will be long enough to even straighten out... maybe I can find him a little puppy wig??? Or in his case, a toupee!!! Thank goodness it is summer or I would have to whip out a doggie sweater for the poor thing.
I take a new EW and flip through the pages, identifying the major stories, the main reviews of movies, television, DVDs, music, and books. Then I pick through the first pages. These are short articles about certain popular artists of the week, entertainment picks for the week, and a column called “News and Notes” which gives interesting information about various entertainment industry issues without pandering to giving “news” about who slept with whom.
NOTE: For I the LORD love judgment, I hate robbery for burnt offering; and I will direct their work in truth, and I will make an everlasting covenant with them. And their seed shall be known among the Gentiles, and their offspring among the people: all that see them shall acknowledge them, that they are the seed which the LORD hath blessed.
‘Yes. that’s right it was…’
Sitting in front of the computer and typing in “craigslist.org” in the browser section of “google chrome” was one of the slowest-going things I’ve had to do for a while. I just dreaded that it would mean more the same endless drudgery that burned me out in the first place. The computer screen felt like it was disappearing further and further into the distance the longer I sat there, waiting, willing myself to press “enter” on my keyboard. I just didn’t want to start this all over again.
Thirds, I used the punched cardstock as a mask on this colored Hero Art's card, and stamped with a lettering stamp. you can use any stamp. then without lifting the mask cardstockm i traced the hearts on to the card with Copic Spica red.
The tatting is a pattern that is available in the book Tatting by Tatsy and you see about 1/3 of what I am making, that is all I will say about that for now.
I am never not happy at the sight of these flowers, either on the way to work or while running errands or just roaming around the city. In a city that has grown amazingly hot and dry, these flowers, along with the gulmohars, seem to provide a burst of cheery colour to soothe your frayed nerves.
So, how much sense does it make for us actively to increase the adult population of what is already a vastly over-populated, environmentally devastated and economically dependent country?
Throughout my visit, we smothered each other in kisses and hugs, played "Tickle and Tackle" (I made that one up; it's played as it sounds.) and couldn't stop laughing. I already miss my five year old love bug.
Whinging on and on about his exhausting kitchen bitch shifts at Café C.
The 6 day experience for your son or daughter is R1 200 for the accommodation, food, lectures, manuals and activities. When you consider that the Summit protects against a destructive influence on campus, it’s a small price to pay. Considering the value of your child’s soul, it’s priceless.
* George Washington and Thomas Jefferson both grew hemp.
Do you believe in dreams?
Friday………………….1/27/12: Yoga
Discreet police barricades hide under archways, containing too easily the sprawling encampment. I want to feel more but I don't. It just reminds me of Goose fair in Nottingham.
Another former Muslim, writer Ibn Warraq, visited Denmark to launch his book Why I am not a Muslim. In an interview, Ibn Warraq stated that especially among the Left there is a post-colonial guilt complex that constitutes an almost insuperable obstacle to any criticism of Islam and Third World cultures. The Left have thus put their own, universal values aside in favor of a dangerous relativism. Ibn Warraq pointed out that more than fifty years after the West left its colonies in the Third World, Leftists are still blaming all the ills of Africa and the Middle East on the former colonial powers, while the same left-wingers only ten years after the fall of Communism blamed Russia’s troubles on unrestrained capitalism. “The Left refuses to seek answers elsewhere. At the same time they are, because of Marx, accustomed to look for economic explanations to everything. Consequently, they seek the explanation to Islamic terrorism in the economic situation. But it is a great mystery to me how 200 dead people in Madrid are supposed to help the poor in the Islamic world.”
My little boy turned seven a few days ago and with it, I turned a new corner in my life. It was a day of celebration, a day of happiness and a day in which I was quietly noting the beginning of a new stage in my life. At least that’s how it seems.
We had a long layover in Denver, so I tried to get some sleep under a row of seats near our terminal. The airport was really quiet at such an early hour, but our terminal was right next to a moving sidewalk from which a very loud, automated voice emanated roughly every minute. It was an annoyingly cheery robotic female voice warning people, in English and Spanish, that the moving sidewalk was coming to an end and to watch their step. It seemed completely unnecessary and I think that's what really ended up getting to me in the end.
Lay sweet potatoes in the pan.
CHICAGO — The City of Chicago must hire 111 black firefighter applicants who were passed over for jobs years ago and pay tens of millions of dollars in damages to about 6,000 other black candidates under a ruling issued on Friday by a federal appeals court.
Rating: 5 stars~ Couldn't put this down!
It is great to create reusable code, but it does not have to handle every future scenario that you can dream up. Instead, stick with the stated features needed but organize the code in a way that makes it easy to extend and improve in future releases. As you develop the code, do team code reviews to identify how to better reuse code, to spot troubled code and to reorganize for maximum maintainability.
I don't have any answers. Over the years, in spite of the accepting environment that is unschooling, my kids have wrestled with shame and fear and feelings of inadequacy. They've had their dark moments. I can only speculate about what has gotten them through those moments and what was missing in this boy's life or psyche that he couldn't do the same.
a flow that allows me to type my thoughts
Matt R: 3.8
Oh how we all want more. However, sometimes what we really want is less. I know many of the things I have wanted lately are less of. I want less pain. I want less cold. I want less of a cold. I want less mean and nasty people. I want less bad food. Sorry, I can see that in wanting less I am blocking MORE. Because I don’t really want those things at all. I want my body to feel more pleasure. I want to feel more warmth. I want to be able to breathe more, and better. I want more nice people. And I so want more good food. Yeah, I really did title this right. I want to be getting MORE. I realized in typing this that I am not a selfish person. On the contrary as I ask for MORE of what I really want that I am increasing the good and as anything good increases it gets bigger and better.
Album Verdict: 91% – Look out for a proper album review.
#1) "We believe that the future of our Communion relies on adherence to Scriptural authority, faithful and Christ-centred preaching of this word, the blessing of God’s Holy Spirit, godly leadership and the spiritual commitment of God’s people." (From here)
Yankee Judging a Texas Chili Cook-off
The pattern seemed in no hurry to change, so I asked out loud within my vision, “OK, how do I get past this?” No change. “Isn’t there a door somewhere?”
Ever have a conversation that you have an idea on how its going to go, then all of a sudden, you realize, before I speak, I need to ask some questions.
It stayed that way until the bottom of the TWELFTH when Pete Levin and Albert Cartwright starting the inning with singles. Brandon Trip was patient and earned a walk to load the bases. Then “Big” Jim Murphy stepped to the dish and whacked one that Ross and I thought was going to go over the wall. It fell short of being a grand slam by only a few inches, but it did score the winning run.
Note that it was a tad ironic for Bloomberg to read, a bit stumblingly, press release praise for Atlantic Yards Community Benefits Agreement (CBA) signatories after he'd previously denounced CBAs as "extortion." Of course he didn't recognize that job-training group BUILD has been sued.
I feel detached and disenchanted.
Is it a faux pas to discuss politics on a blog that is about parenting, green living, and overall goodness? Probably, but I'm doing it anyway. I care dammit and it breaks my heart that my generation is generalized as an apathetic, lazy bunch of moochers who keep themselves uninformed in order to continue being said losers. I believe those people exist mind you, I'm "friends" with lots of them on facebook, but I don't believe they are the majority.
Thank You live in Kino Šiška, music tells it all – fantastic perfomance
This is important, and therefore it is important that US citizens, lawmen and politicians stand up when people are getting tortured and humiliated. Not just become everybody e who stands accused of a crime deserves a fair trial, but also to the rule of law and its principles is a big part of what is worth defending against those terrorists who are trying to bring down the civilized society .
One that we will pay for literally forever.
Coralie in Canada
"Let's see what happens when we make the earthling consume mass quantities of Carbonated caramelized sugar water within a ten second period of time."
This time however two concerned young men asked me if they could help; they didn’t ask if I was present although I thought they surely could see that I was stuck there in my muffled minioned stew stirred by the warlock — that young progenitor of aforementioned concoctery, but this time I did not fall down. I recognized the state. I saw my plexus and embraced it wholeheartedly. Lost in a box store as was everyone there but I knew it I was present not chemically altered lest you, dear reader, suppose. Forty years of mountain sitting could not have brought me closer to the seed, the essence. Death perhaps maybe but forever forward knowing and I avoiding the horrors of the store-in-a-box story.
The colour is deep dark eggplant purple with an awesome texture inbetween creme and jelly. Probably I mentioned before that such a texture is very characteristic for Andreia polishes, together with a crazy gloss - there is NO top coat on the pictures!! As usual, I'm very pleased with Andreia, and I recommend all of you to get some and to see yourself how great they are. If they are not sold around, you might try to find a Portuguese swap buddy : )
24. For several centuries the practice prevailed in the Church of giving children the Eucharist after the sacrament of baptism….For the last four centuries, the Western church has not given the Eucharist to children after baptism. But it must be admitted that the Rituals of the Oriental churches contain a rite of Communion for children after baptism. Assemanus the Younger (Codicis Liturgici), bk. 2, p. 149) gives the ceremony of conferring baptism among the Melchites. On page 309, he quotes the Syrians’ baptismal ceremony as it was published by Philoxenus, the Monophysite Bishop of Mabbug, and on p. 306, the ceremony from the ancient Ritual of Severus, Patriarch of Antioch and leader of the Monophysites. He gives also the ceremonies of baptism observed by the Armenians and Copts (bk. 3, p. 95 and 130). All of these ceremonies command that the Eucharist should be given to children after baptism.
I remember not wanting to nurse Josiah anymore like I'd planned too. I know that I loved him, but I just didn't have anything to give just right then. I laid there, with him beside me in that glass crib that they put babies in and at that moment I needed him near me. I picked him up and as stared at him. I didn't really know what to think, except that he looked like his father to me. The thought made me smile. The smile warmed my heart and then I cried. I didn't really know why I was crying. Was I happy or was I sad?
Well somewhere between stop and go and HOLY CRAP all hell broke loose!!!
Have you ever been so hungry you morphed into an evil witch? Rather than cautious, the driver ahead of you seems irritating-tortoise-like slow. No—criminal. And if she doesn’t get her act together soon, you might provide a subtle NUDGE. Or worse…
Peggy’s character indicates the birth of a cultural revolution – the modern woman. Smart, loving, and domestic but still ambitious, the modern woman is relatable because she is present in society today. Peggy embodies the classic internal struggle present in women of the 60’s – choosing between a successful career and a family of her own. In season one, Peggy has a short-lived affair with Peter Campbell and shortly thereafter learns she is pregnant. She carries the baby full term, puts him up for adoption, and returns to work.
Web design is the art of creating web pages, this emphasis on creativity and use of technologies such as the use of HTML, CSS, ASP, SSL, PHP, XML and others. In short we can say that web design is a collective work aims to create web pages.
I've got an alright resume, already: Joseph and The Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat, Nunsense, La Cage Aux Follies, My Fair Lady, Falsettos. And sure, this was all for little theater companies in Sacramento, but it's not like the music I learned will change anytime soon, let alone that I was able to learn it, and that gives me faith that there is nothing separating me from my dreams.
I will not let teaching erase me. I will not be obliterated through deadlike pinkish walls, by playing the subaltern adjunct game. Every day a new chair to sit in, a new temporary office. I threaten to disappear. Will not. I will steal myself away. Sylvia Plath at Smith (you are not Sylvia, you are not at Smith). I write so that I can be I. I write to say fuck-all with reason. To say fuck-all with composition. I will not compose myself. Compose yourselves class. Compose yourselves.
I've known these clients for several years and have been working with them on updating their seaside home in phases. My first project with them was providing a new paint scheme for the homes exterior. That was way back in 2007. Above is an image of the exterior which faces the water.
09 - Good Rockin Tonite 03:26
a certain person who was caught gathering pieces of gold out of the
Artists including Cate Blanchett, Damien Hirst, Wynton Marsalis, Yoko Ono and Ai Wei Wei are set to take part.
Brazil’s central bank said it sees a “high” chance of the benchmark Selic rate falling to a single digit, after cutting the rate last week for a fourth straight time to 10.5 percent.
As you notice there are tallies by some of the words! We have a challenge! Every time the children use the word throughout the day in the correct context, we get a tally! Check out how many we have already!
For example, we don’t see much of Daenerys. Just a quick glimpse of her with her depleted khalsar, wandering the red waste with a dragon on her shoulder.
a pebble
Here' s the gig--I am a writer. I firmly believe in the powers of the First Amendment and the protection of free speech in this country. The First Amendment is one of the cornerstones of our Constitution.
Michelle has created a plan to cook all 5 dinners for the week in just ONE hour. All the menu plans have family friendly meals that feed 4-6 people and no, they are not all casseroles. :)
Method number two was much more successful. For one thing it sounded exciting – ‘pecorino Toscano stagionato with fig paste’ sounds almost like a poem. I have one Rick Tramonto to thank for it, and a www.tastebook.com reference to it and his surely excellent book, Osteria. Pecorino could be set aside however – it was Rick’s spiced fig paste that I craved. Creation of it was utter simplicity. The figs are baked for a while until “dried and shrunk by about a quarter”. For my version, read: “shrunk and a smidge cremated due to the completely unregulated furnace that is our ancient, rescued-from-the-scrapman Smeg cooker”. A cup of port is boiled with rosemary to kill off the alcohol, reduce and season, then added to the baked figs, anointed with olive oil, salt, pepper and orange zest. A food processor reduces the lot to paste in short order. My version employed red wine and balsamic vinegar in the absence of port, plus a bit of cinnamon, cardamom and nutmeg to add Eastern mystique. A hand-held blender did the pasting perfectly well.
Happy Monday!! I am actually posting this on a Monday morning with my coffee by my side. Wouldn't it be nice to do this everyday, hehe! I love long weekends. Hope you all had a wonderful weekend. Ours was very quiet but that's ok!
friendly microbes play a huge role in our digestive and immune systems.
We were given this little wooden basket which we stained with Plaid Folkart stain, colour Apple Butter Brown, how delicious does that name sound.
Apparently, the child woke fresh as a daisy.
The Sisters Of Mercy quickly led me to other bands such as The Mission, (Wayne and Craig left The Sisters to form The Mission) The Cure and Jesus And Mary Chain. Much to my surprise of course, I found out The Cure had been going for ages so I got into them late but in a big way. Sadly, they were at their darkest and most gothic in the early 80′s when I was a Duranie!
The back also shows that A. E. "Red" Patterson was the Angels Team President at that time, a title he held for 3 years, then becomming a long-time Angel executive.
In five minutes you are happily chowing down on an inexpensive, filling meal. But don’t be fooled – the true cost of fast food does not come out of your wallet, but out of your body, your health, and your years on this earth.
The love of God does not consist in mere words, but in sorrow and bitter sufferings, in being despised by the world, abandoned by all creatures, and, it may seem, at times, in the withdrawal of even our Creator’s favour. In spite of all these trials, the Christian’s courage must be firm; he must not complain, nor lose heart; he should imitate the martyr who, while they were disembowelling him and tearing the flesh from his bones with iron hooks, had no word on his lips but the Name of Jesus, nor any thought in his heart but “Blessed be God”…
The initial conversation I talked about was the permitted earnings post interview last week and not getting the job. I also admitted that I truly was not disappointed and admitted it was not the right time for me to consider paid work. Mr Therapist enquired more, I explained:
I don’t think I would have done anything else differently making this remix ifi could go back, I had fun making the project and think it’s a cool way to show the class another side of my community that really doesn’t get seen all that much.
“I long for the day I can return to my beloved parents when my service is over.
There has not been much time for jewelry making, that's for sure. In the last 3 days, I have made double - and sometimes triple - batches of 11 different kinds of Christmas Cookies and Candy...and I am not done yet! But, the house smells good! For the first time in MANY years, the entire family will be together to celebrate Christmas Eve...all 17 of us at my house! So, yes, more cookies to be made....
They absorb oil and shine well and they also give my face a somewhat matte feel, but I'm not sure if they really minimize pores. Maybe it does a little bit over time, but it hasn't happened for me, haha! ;)
Time was enough
Bardwell, who said the state attorney general had warned him years ago that he would eventually get into trouble for refusing to perform interracial marriages, was undeterred.
The Bungalow by Sarah Jio
1c butter, softened
I want the stock to have better options for mounting something underneath. A foregrip and light combo, or a grip-pod. This comes with a rail underneath, and I have a rail already on top. And I know I can ring a 9 inch gong from 250 yards out if I have a rest or 'bipod.' So also good.
Onion, 1 pc, cut into slices
I got up from my desk, I could feel evey ones eyes staring at my back as I walked out the door and down to the Boys room. I tried my best to wash myself off and I must have been there for a while, because when I walked out I could see my Mom talking with the Nun outside the classroom. My little sister Isabel was there too, just sitting in her stroller staring at the Nun. We left early that day and as we walked along Fort Hamilton Parkway towards East 4th the Church bells started ringing.
The graphics in Trine 2 are detailed and the use of vivid colors and lighting makes are impressive. The backgrounds are lush and beautiful as they make the world feel large even though you move left and right. The attention of detail is outstanding when the developers could have cheated and repeated scenery and objects all throughout the game.
3. Know How to Give Great Answers to Common Job Interview Questions
Not every fairy tale begins with a prince or a princess.
Salary: Rs 1.80 lac-2 lac p.a + incentives.
Today I made a little set of cards using Onesie Twosie, a super sweet set illustrated by Nancy McKinney for the Whimsical Wishes line of stamps. This mini set of 19 images and sentiments is completely interchangeable for girls, boys, and twins!
So I sat reminising about this and getting blue, bluer still when I thought I saw the ghost of Boke the Cat.
Checking for previous VRTSvmpro installations… done
This week the family planted a 10km stretch of roadway leading out of Alexandria with roadsigns. It's all part of the educational campaign which they believe is needed to teach people the Ten Commandments all over again. The Ten Commandments are common to the three main faiths - Christian, Jewish and Islam - so there is a lot of scope for this campaign to make a difference worldwide, not only in South Africa.
And I have already bought my present for myself, if I see anything else I like I will have to buy it for the Head Chef. Only last night I was discussing with friends the concept of the 'house present' for husbands . . . and with that 'handy hint' I will leave you.
Suitably impressed, the trainer said he believed this dog could be trained to find drugs, bombs, bodies, anything.
Eye shadows - MAC 'Orange' Shiseido 'Violet Splendor' INGLOT Pigment '180' Peggy Sage
Court evidence also showed that the City still does not have other key approvals for the expressway project, including the authority to re-locate 7.6 kilometres of Red Hill Creek, and a permit to excavate 70,000 tonnes of the toxic Rennie Street dump which lies in the path of the proposed road.
With a technology like that, which can’t offer any new functions and just replicates old ones in a different form, ease of use is key to adoption. Unfortunately, contact lenses aren’t easy to use. They’re difficult to put in and fiddly to take out. They have to be kept in saline solution overnight. You can’t pop them in and quickly take them out – it’s a time consuming process. If I decide to use my laptop, I grab it and flip it open and my screen is ready to go. If I decide to use my contact lens HUD with wireless keyboard, I have to spend five minutes in a bathroom poking around at my eyeballs. Why bother?
Wendy: Did you want to stay in your chrysalis?
ascending the gangplank two by two,
Something I never knew was that Bell’s is the only major blended whisky to be aged for 8 years, so you’ll be drinking something a little bit special! Its steeped in history that includes Arthur J Bell and his two sons Arthur Kimmond Bell and Robert Duff Bell. His sons are responsible for expanding the product overseas and to trademark the now familiar ‘Arthur Bell & Sons’ and their motto ‘Afore ye go’.
iii. On account of the conduct of the supplier; or
It’s true; they simply adored blacks too.
It's that family togetherness, the minhagim and the brachot my parents bestowed upon one another and us children that I remember, that warm my heart, as I stand in shul, listen to the sounds of the shofar and pray for my voice/our voices to be heard.
Last week, I was on set to watch in action and interview long-time Sesame puppeteer Marty Robinson (stay tuned for the post about him!). A ways into the shoot, I was invited to come sit at the counter in Mr. Hooper's store to get a better view of the puppeteers. Sitting on the stools beside me were a man and a woman. The man was doing sketches of scenes with Sesame characters. Intrigued, I struck up a conversation.
19 April 2012
Fiddler on the Roof?
We pray for their birth family. It was the only way the hubby and I could forgive them for all they have done to harm our children. We don’t want our kids to be bitter. We don’t tell them a lot. But they remember a lot. We are honest with them, and sometimes we just have to tell them when they are older we can explain things better, that they are just too young to understand some things.
Administrator and technical lead for all development on the Microsoft SQL Server/BI environment including service products (SSIS, SSAS and SSRS), Performance Point, Sharepoint and Excel Services.
went anywhere without a thermometer,
Believe it or not, it's also time for a new Flourishes Timeless Tuesday ~ FTTC132. Cindy is hosting and she has challenged us to create a card with a *SENTIMENT OR VERSE* as a focal point.
07 A Liberal Education
Nothing you can do or say will break me down
The Top 5 Winners are:
I feel better now. Half of my fear was met yesterday when she told me that she was translating the post no matter what. The interesting part will be where we end up from here. Sigh, the issue of time. He has never been my friend.
1) Preheat oven to 350 degrees.
The Executive Chamber, State Capitol
Monday night we had our Photoshop Elements class and our instructor Michael shared some of the details of his week in Las Vegas at Movie.Con.
“Well you can hear them in that clearing at night. I didn’t believe it until I set up a tent in that small clearing and the skies are always so cloudy there, so you’re hard pressed to catch a glimpse.” She looked upwards as if in contrast. The sky here was clear and crisp; Derrek noticed for the first time that it was so different from the city, and even different from rural areas he had been in.
I'm pretty sure I still have the demo, but haven't unearthed it yet(or seen it in over a decade). This CD compiles the bands early stuff, including the demo. I love this stuff..raw silly sounding thrashed out punk hardcore.
Beneath these existential waves I drown in
The majority of my peers at IBOLC are younger than me, hovering around the age of 23. Many of them were just finishing elementary school on 9/11. They grew up with The War as a constant, something that began when they were barely cognizant of what was happening outside of their neighborhood. We fought in Iraq and Afghanistan and there was little reason to think that it would ever stop. At some point, they decided that the military was right for them. They waited patiently until they were old enough to enlist, and then chose to delay a few more years in order to go to school and join as an officer.
All colors shine brighter
19. more fish
in it there is no haste.
..... starting tomorrow maybe. I have hours of RHONJ, RHODC, Flipping out, Rachel Zoe, Sarah's house, Real Genevieve, Project Runway and Top Chef to catch up on. Shut up. I used to feel guilty about the amount of reality tv i watched considering my husband is an actor (whose job is perpetually endangered due to reality tv), but now that i'm in the unscripted Hollywood world (thanks to a reality show), i feel its my duty to give hours of my week to the best of the unscripted. For it is thee whom i love the most.
Seditions Act is a very useful tool. What is sedition, if you are charged, would be decided by a judge, and if you appeal further, a few judges. They decide it is not, and the very next day might find themselves transferred to career Siberia.
This past week we had dirt and six pallets of sod delivered to try to get areas that have never seen grass covered. It looks like it will take about two more pallets but it will look really nice once it is all done. Unfortunately, as we were trying to spread dirt and lay sod Friday and Saturday we had thunder storms and torrential down pours. It did make having mud fights with the boys a lot easier.
The main thing is
We talked about Leprechaun traps and Kenzie said he wanted to make one but it would have to be safe and not hurt him!
xoxo-a
Approximently 1 cup of noodles (I used gluten-free)
Of course, I could have read the label. 20 grams of sugar in a spoonful – that’s a couple of bowls of Lucky Charms cereal with extra marshmallows and sugar added. No wonder I felt so strange after my Nutella and Red Bull breakfast. At least I didn’t feed my four year old the stuff like the mother who filed the lawsuit against Nutella maker Ferrero, the fine Italian chocolatier. I actually don’t have a four year old and it was my 19 year who turned me onto the stuff.
A range of Dermalogica products (which also includes hand cream)
by Michelle Paver
You will probably have to do a bit of clean up and adjustment at this point, readjusting the zipper, erasing bits of the orange half from the apple, etc.
There are many entertainment magazines in the UK, but I decided to select heatworld (the online partner with heat magazine) as an option on my poll, due to it’s large online presence on social networking sites such as Twitter. Its website is also very well established and is updated regularly. However, only 9% of the participants on my blog use it as their main source of entertainment news. This could be because of the range of other websites online, or because of the competitive market within entertainment magazines, and other options may be available.
I also knit up a few face/spa cloths using some nice soft cotton yarns I found on sale at Tuesday Morning (a very dangerous place for me to shop, if you know what I mean). One of these made for some relaxing vacation knitting while I was at Clear Lake in early May.
—-What do birthdays mean to you?
A little late to this, but I have been busy with exploits that shall yield many intersting blog posts whenever I find time to write them - stay tuned. I have been lax with the news of fresh hop beers, one of my favorite craft beer products, but I have now had enough that I am ready to give a short synopsis. It is not a completely useless endeavor, I think there are still a number of them on tap and in the bottle so there is still time to get your fix in quickly before the winter ale season begins in earnest.
He imagines a Britain where our agricultural system is run like a Soviet collective. Everything is controlled by the state, everyone involved is employed by the state, all supplies are directed centrally. He then develops this crazy fantasy. The government decides on reform to allow farmers to choose between suppliers. He describes the response to this suggestion as follows...
*Which is, of course, precisely why I started The Potty Diaries nearly 5 years ago - to find the funny side in stuff that would otherwise drive me crazy...
The following information concerning the new Portuguese law on the settlement of disputes involving reference medicines and generic medicines comes from a fellow blogger, the excellent Pedro Malaquias (PLMJ, Portugal), who prefaces it with two disclaimers. First, he is a trainee lawyer whose firm represents several generic companies in litigation procedures against originators. Secondly, the views he expresses are his own and do not necessarily represent the views of any other people or organizations.
5 1/2″ Ice Cream
"Kids are gonna eat treats, right? So we have to find a way to make treats okay," Kass adds.
stayed at. It would be interesting to see the staff side of the
You’re the Coliseum.
The only legal party in the U.S.S.R. is the Communist Party; the only legal opinion is that expressed by the Secretariat. No Communist political program ever prescribed the suppress of rival workers’ and peasants’ parties, nor did it forbid divergencies of opinion in the Party. On the contrary, seven weeks before the October Revolution, Lenin made the following statement, which here is quoted word for word: “Alone the power of the Soviets could ensure a widespread, constant development of revolutionary influence, a peaceful rivalry of parties within the Soviets” (September 14, 1917: One of the fundamental questions of the Revolution). A little later, he repeated this: “The parties’ struggle for power may be peacefully carried on in the heart of the Soviets, provided that the latter desist from distorting democratic principles: (September 16 1927: The bugbear of civil war). The ideas of Lenin, the theorist of Bolshevism and the founder of the Soviet Republic, are limpid clear. Moreover, when the country was in the grip of war and the Soviet regime was passing through a most critical period, political parties like the Mensheviks, Socialist Revolutionaries of the Left, Ukranian Borotbists, the Bund, and various anarchist groups, which did not oppose the system with force of arms, all enjoyed a legal existence. Their disappearance was the logical result of the war and of civil strife, which culminated in a paroxysm of fury and a reign of terror; but their suppression should have been but of a temporary nature, like terror and warfare themselves. The danger of war once over, the Revolution moved forward along the paths of peace and Lenin’s program once more became an actuality and should have recovered strength and meaning: peaceful rivalry of parties within the Soviets. But Tomsky, a member of the Political Bureau and President of the Party Secretariat and of the Central Council of Trades Unions, made the following pronouncement on the matter: “The main difference between the Party systems in Western Europe and in Russia, is that, with us, only one thing is possible: one party is in power and all the rest are in prison” (“Trud“, November 13 1927). Such was the progress made between 1917 and 1927. Lenin had spoken of a peaceful rivalry of parties within the Soviets, but Tomsky declared that one party was in power and the rest were in prison. The inevitable perpetuation of this method of government had led to the imprisonment and deportation of all those who actively opposed the Secretariat of the Party; amongst them were Lenin’s most faithful comrades in arms, headed by Trotsky.
Make visible the beauty, the strength or whatever you wish to share about bubbles.
As we walked towards the Church of San Sebastian, we felt so downhearted that this church had to be painted this flimsy green hue. It is made of a steel frame and panels and is known for being the only neo-gothic steel church in the Philippines and in Asia. The minty green shade certainly does not give it justice.
Large parts of El Salvador are without power or clean water and remain cut off from government aid because of collapsed bridges and washed-up roads
Merci
I know I ranted and maybe I do mean to point the finger a little bit. I feel it is our responsibility at moms and dads to help our kids this way. I’m sure I’m not the only one. What do you do in your house to encourage healthy eating? Do you have a favorite trick? (this rant could be followed up with the terrible snacks they serve at preschool or the awful and disgusting treats people send in for birthdays in school! Munchkins first ingredient isn’t sugar, so they are ok?? UGH!).
The thrift store - now that's a good one to put on.
Thea is officially a spinster. After a few seasons attempting to garner attention with youth and ribbons and no dowery to speak of Thea left the ballrooms of the country and settled into life as a Vicar’s sister. She spends her days writing her brother’s sermons and keeping her nose in a book. Many a fine hour is spent in quiet study of the latest tomes.
You know how it is with an April day.
it would be our debt He paid.
Location Address:
Peter Som, how to begin. Over the last decade Peter Som was a part of the young crop of designers that took the industry by storm. Yet, it must be admitted that perhaps in the last few years Som's name has been overshadowed if only ever so slightly by other phenoms like Wang, Lim, and Wu--not anymore. Som's A/W 2010 collection was the toast of New York. The collection was a psychedelic trip through a winter that is nothing if not incredibly fun. Som came out of the gate very cautiously with a fur coat showing signs of what the collection was to contain--the coat was lined with a wild green print while the blouse, skirt prints were incredibly complimentary.
"Hey, BB, I can speak Italian," Pie told me as she walked into the kitchen on arriving home from school.
Accessories: stitched poly ribbon, pink bling
Now, please, without further adieu…ENJOY the best anti-gay video I have ever seen.
T-shirt - also Target.....I rarely wear it because it has weird length sleeves....but its perfect under a cardi.
Oh, and of course, this is going to be my musical link up with Goodnight Moon for he music hop tomorrow :D Head over later tonight or in the morning to hear all kinds of fabulous music!
Sakura Glaze: White
Have you ever had a project that was so daunting that you put it off...and put it off again? That is how I have felt about my wedding scrapbook. I am obviously an avid scrapbooker so people assume I would have finished months ago but I am just so intimated by it that for the last ten months all I had done was buy the paper! I mean how do you go about picking pictures when you have over 800 images and you love 110% of them! So a few weeks ago, with the help of my friend Michelle, I FINALLY got started on a layout. I started with a sketch by Becky Fleck and some beautiful paper I bought by the ton by Pebbles.
If you cant deal with then then get out of the EDL.
excessively complaining about our extracurricular activities while secretly enjoying them
Here's the answer:
Location awareness is a key component to the success of mobile marketing. What better way to take advantage of consumers engaging with brands on the go than catering advertising to their precise position? Brands are able to interact with their consumers immediately and effectively by relaying information that is timely. Relevancy goes hand in hand with social CRM research – making audiences, messages, timing and place all relevant for the consumers’ sake and your brand’s effectiveness. Knowing where your consumers are is becoming as increasingly important as what your consumers want.
Izzat Skip? Izzat Skip decorating the Fox's tree?
“Our motto will be, ‘What would Jesus do?’ Our aim will be to act as He would if He was in our places, regardless of immediate results. In other words, we propose to follow Jesus’ steps as closely and as literally as we believe He taught His disciples to do” (Charles M. Sheldon. In His Steps—first published in 1897 (Old Tappan, NJ: Spire Books, published by Pyramid Publications, Inc. for the Fleming H. Revell Company, 1963, p. 16).
After arranging for the guide, they made me wear a sarong like most of the visitors. Only the schoolchildren were not wearing sarongs. I’m not sure what the rule is, but it’s all cool.
Of course I think you should watch this film if you haven’t already. It is clever and witty and includes all the little details that make a movie worth watching and re-watching.
"American officials," Risen writes, "say the Karzais and a handful of other well-connected familieshave benefited from the billions of dollars that the United States has poured into the country since 2001. That money has helped pay the salaries of some Karzais who are government employees, kick-started real estate development and construction projects involving family members and created demand for businesses tied to the Karzais.
to Colossa, to retrieve a magic lamp that the
Accessories: epoxy strip, rhinestones
First up: Ants, I took this on the way home from picking Coleen up from school one afternoon last week. There was a huge pile of Ants on the sidewalk so I thought it would be fun to take a Macro shot of them. After I viewed the picture on the screen I was surprised to see that the ants had captured a grasshopper and we're all in a frenzy over their kill.
18. Boys don’t use as much deodarent.
when I go down to the Zoo!
- love love love puppies !
· People from Siebel CRM / Payroll / HR domain experience would be preferred.
* Bands
First up is the Love Multiplied iPad3 Giveaway for the Spitz family to bring home their princess Lilianna. I shared this giveaway once already, but this family could really use our help. This is their third trip across the ocean to bring home a little one in two years. They need us. They're obedience and faith is humbling and I long to see this mountain moved. They're busy taking care of their family and the paperwork to get to Lilianna, let's help take care of the finances for them. Lilianna is just precious. Don't believe me, see for yourself...
Our daughter is very near to earning her high school diploma and also wants to persue a career in the EMT or medical field....
Serve with fresh egg noodles (blanched) and watercress, bok choy, yu choy or iceberg lettuce (I prefer watercress, it's peppery taste goes well with the duck).
You’re Not Alone, Saosin – Things change for Joy when she meets Creed, May, and Santos. But there are challenges even in finding a new family, especially when they have secrets of their own.
Blue Scholar Blog: Do you have anything else to add?
And in a restaurant kitchen there are certain guidelines and rules that you cannot break. Maybe bend a little, but not break. You need to have order and organisation. You tend to need to have some consistency in your food, cos old matey aint gonna keep comin’ back if you can’t make his food quality each time, is he?
Cost of the Artistic Journey 2012 is $295.00.
My almost 5 year old neighbor, Rebecca - the one I drive home from preschool four days a week and whom I have babysat, played with, and known since birth - leaned over toward my Audrey and said with complete seriousness: "Audrey.... is that your Mom?"
We'll never know if different care would have changed the outcome. Maybe it would have been the same and he would have died no matter what we did. But maybe he would have had a chance if I'd been more knowledgeable; if she'd have been more aggressive.
They're actually boxed brownies taken up a notch!
which phase?
When the music finally stopped and we are able to grab a few hours of sleep, we awoke on Saturday and tackled our first decision of the day…what to have for breakfast. Now, if this was some foodie-and-travel blog, I would tell you what we had, how to prepare it, and even post some FAB photos of it complete with creative lighting and maybe even a well-placed fork.
In very small print (at the bottom of the page) was this remark: Jesus’ faithful disciples were ordinary men who became extraordinary because of Jesus Christ. Despite their confusion and lack of understanding during Jesus life-time, they became powerful witnesses to His resurrection. Their lives were transformed by God’s Power. The story of Jesus, disciples does not end with the Gospels; it continues in the book of Acts and many of the letters.
Coordinating childcare for this event has really helped to revitalize my hope for our collective, for Baltimore 'radicals' and for the world (okay may that's over stating it).
Turns out there was a suspicious suitcase parked on the Jay Street sidewalk behind the Marriott. It also turns out, according to the Brooklyn Eagle, that the same building houses the Brooklyn District Attorney’s Office, the New York City Law Department and the Secret Service! So an unattended suitcase probably caught someone's eye pretty quick.
As always the best in-depth coverage will be on TomVille Tonight.
* Spirituality and Communication
Do you know that you can preserve enormous cash in the Internet plan if you think about making web visitors from google.
Staying within the budget
The Secret People by G. K. Chesterton
2010.08.11 Pakistan Karachi 2 0 Two Shias are shot to death by Sunnis in separate drive-by attacks.
BOSCHKOP, Pretoria, South Africa, April 11 2009 – A Dutch immigrant couple from the Utrecht region who had emigrated to South Africa in 1982 to run a dairy farm, was murdered on Easter Friday, April 10 2009. The farmer, 63-year-old Johannes van den Bosch, was bludgeoned to death while milking the cows early that morning.
“Freezing Nights” is an ecumenical shelter ministry for homeless people. Since 2004, it has provided a place for those without shelter to sleep and receive food during winter months. A different church takes on each night of the week.
"I don't know him, Uncle Slappy." I settled into my chair, put my feet up on the ottoman and got ready to hear one of Slappy's Byzantine legends.
Mr D nodded, taking his glasses off and tiredly wiped the tears from his eyes. Then with articulated care, he picked up his cup, took a sip and placed it back on the table, his every movement riddled with intense pain.
Artist : “That, sir, is a cow grazing”
For many immersed in a culture where vinyasa yoga is more readily associated with a New York Sports Club than a Hindu temple, the origin matters little. And for some of the devout living here, the American conception has overridden the beliefs with which they were raised.
The sun is low now, and the light is gold. We finish shooting.
Apparently it does stuff I haven't done with it, watch movies or something.
I wanted to buy the entire store but I settled for a few new things for our apartment. It definitely needed a little revamping. I promise I am going to post some photos soon. ;)
I’m scared; I’m sweating
Day after day Joe has been crawling around on the shed roof amongst the mulberry leaves, searching for any sign of new growth. It is one thing seeing your grown man climb a mulberry tree, it is altogether another thing to hear a grown man sobbing in a mulberry tree. Oh well, our mulberry tarts and smoothies for the challenge will simply have to be struck off the menu. On the upside, it means that we wont be able to make any mulberry wine this season. Shucks!
“And, I, ladies, am more happy to see you than I care to admit. I must say your timing is rather impeccable. I think you saved me from a rather painful end. But, how did you get here?”
The study is on distracting sins. The first chapter is on pride…so we will go through some verses on the rewards of relying on God and the hardships of pride.
“MIKE CHECK” “MIKE CHECK” “MIKE CHECK” This is how you take the floor during the general assembly. “DIRECT RESPONSE” “DIRECT RESPONSE” With a little chutzpah and these two phrases an individual can control the discussion. Is it expedient, yes at times it works and can be used to make group decisions which the majority can understand and decide upon quickly. Many decisions such as how to clean the plaza, to occupy city hall, or call for a general strike, move a crowed to form a strike line, or deciding to march left or right can be accomplished by this method.
1/2 onions, sliced
Through solitude, our spirit, soul, and body are refreshed and nourished, but then we must return to the world and the company of others. Like Jesus, we must come down from the mountain and feed the crowds. We must do the good work. We must demonstrate our love for God and for others in tangible ways. We must be the salt of the earth. We must let our light shine.
Behe’s book was a serious blow to Darwinism. In fact, Peter van Inwagen, Professor of Philosophy at the University of Notre Dame, stresses the importance of the book in this manner:
No, no. Of course not. Rachel needed to purge the idea from her very soul. She knew that. Kidding herself otherwise would just get her hurt...very hurt.
I sense that the far right thinks it needs a win only once every few election cycles, combined with a relentless campaign of demonization, legislative obstruction, and litigation at all other times, to score a net advance for the cause of the right. If you live in Wisconsin, Michigan, Florida, Ohio, or Maine, tell me: does that sound about right? If righties think that, can we really say they're crazy, given how quickly they can pass extreme legislation when they do gain power, and how much obstruction they're capable of at other times?
My LQS always has some treasures that are out-of-print, and this one is no exception. For this prize, I'm offering one yard of fabric--four fat quarters of Luna II by Maywood Studios. These luscious chocolates will make a delicious little treat, or a lovely addition to your stash!
A compendium of all the best quilt photography on the web.
I had a wonderful Saturday with my girlfriend Kristin.
As-salamu alaikum brothers and sisters,
off to the south
Pakatan Rakyat pattern to condone heckling against BN leaders
Background -
The context for our first steps into the Vietnam morass was the Cold War and the doctrine of containment adopted by the Truman Administration in hopes of halting Soviet expansion in Central and Eastern Europe. Despite the terrifying fact that the Russians somehow had developed their own atomic bomb by 1949, the Cold War in Europe soon reached a stalemate. By that time, however, we perceived a similar Communist threat orchestrated, we were sure, from the Kremlin, in Asia. China “fell” to Mao Zedong’s Red Army in 1949; tensions between Communist North Korea and anti-Communist South Korea were about to explode. Meanwhile, the U.S. itself was in the throes of a second “Red Scare” that would produce a Commie-hunting, demagogic Republican Senator from Wisconsin, Joseph R. McCarthy.
Yesterday we woke to a beautiful morning, it was the sort of day that you just had to go out and be part of, the sights & sounds of nature springing back into life in the warmth after its winter sleep, I so love this time of year.
What's left to do? There's an important subplot that I've only hinted at in this rough draft, a couple of relationships not explored, and two characters who don't do much except service the main storyline at present. I'm hoping to strengthen these elements in the script today to truly 'complete' this rough for the end of April.
Three of my favorite movies to watch are:
well.... somehow we missed our train, so we had to wait for another bit.
Be alert about new trends, new possibilities and fortune tellers – not everything is a need and not everything is evil. Make your own mind and see what makes only you outstanding.
Kit includes the following:
Since 1941, Mexico was home to the nasty dirty “secret” of a nasty dirty man –better said, a priest– who founded a kiddie-diddling sect called the Legionnaires of Christ and proclaimed himself head kiddie diddler. And for the following decades right up to 2006, diligently diddle did he, with the seminarists lined up to witness the miracle of the divine rod. In a sane society, a man like this would be castrated and locked away to rot. In the roamin’ church, however, such behavior is so standard that no-one bats an eyelid… except maybe the seminarists, at least the first time.
Benjamin Franklin said, “God helps those who help themselves”, and over the years most think that is in the Bible. John Wesley, the founder of Methodism says, “Cleanliness is next to godliness”, and we think that’s somewhere in the Bible, too.
Several newspapers such as the Mint and the ET have recently reported on how the Supreme Court has rejected Hilton’s appeal against an adverse judgment passed by a District Court in Rajasthan last year. We have blogged previously about the judgment over here and here. It is likely though that both newspapers have been slightly inaccurate in their reporting. Both news reports seem to suggest that the order of the Supreme Court upholds the decision of the District Court.
A country that is all the ways you choose to live
Like eating a well done fillet steak it may take moment to digest that news.
the girl in the sandbox."
The Built-In Dual Cooling Fan put into these amps will keep them running all day and night, at a cool temperature to ensure the amp lasts a long time, and operates smoothly at all tim… Read More >>
Location: First Street Corner Third Street
Here are some questions for Elizabeth Warren. What are the chances that she would answer any of them?1. Do you favor racial preferences in university hiring and admissions? In the corporate world? In federal contracting? How about in government lending policies?
Morgana - Lady Godiva (applied to inner lid with MAC 239 by patting)
Someone will fail you.
Bird-watching is a very interesting hobby that I have. Bird-watchers are looked at weirdly at school gatherings, just like people who want to tell you about school-work the whole time. To put it plainly, bird-watching isn’t the “in thing” amongst young people. It’s a pity though, because bird-watching can really be fun.
Tickets are still available for The Salvation Army Women’s Auxiliary 24th Annual Celebration of Hope “Dignity Within Reach” luncheon on Sept. 20 at the Oak Tree Country Club,700 Country Club Drive in Edmond.
Okay. So that’ll probably never happen, but I just feel as though that attention gets a little old. People need their space. I’ve missed out on a number of opportunities just so I wouldn’t be a bother. Last semester, I stood face-to-face with Southern-rock god and influential storyteller, Mike Cooley from the Drive-by Truckers. He was wandering around downtown Tuscaloosa before DBT’s show back in September of last year. I was standing outside Rooster’s Blues House with my manager, Scott, handing out flyers to passer-bys when Cooley walked up. There I was, all googly-eyed and unable to utter a sound except for a barely audible “Hi.” I stared and smiled as he talked with Scott about the night’s show (see, Rooster’s hosted the DBT show at the Bama Theatre. I felt honored). Eventually, Cooley heads off and I wave goodbye, regretting my inability to ask for his autograph. Scott didn’t even realize who he had been talking to for the past three minutes. Of course I made sure to fill him in, including my confession of obsession. I’m still mad at myself to this day. I didn’t look cool. I just looked crazy.
Lucky 7 MEME was initially created for writers and so here are the rules:
Bob: How can people get contact you today if they have any questions or want to talk further about your comments today?
We relaxed at the hotel before meeting Paula at Star Noodle. She had been on Maui a few days and was heading home in the evening, so we met her for an early dinner. Reservations are not accepted, so it was good we arrived early (5:45pm). The place was full within the hour. Located in an industrial park, I guess only those “in the know” know about this place. I wouldn’t have found it unless told or read about it. The room is large with a communal table in the center and smaller tables for 2 to 6 people. From the windows you could look out towards the sunset.
This book is why I started blogging... to save the memories.
Since it was created, the phrase “Get off the phone!” has been yelled throughout households all around the world. Whether you had chores to do, homework, or you were just running up the bill, you had to get off the phone.
Since I have most of the ingredients ready, I might as well have pizza for lunch.
so very briskly
Married: September 1, 1982 2nd- Alan Keith Thingpen
Test tube studies conducted by the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) suggest that lutein may be just as effective at combating free radicals as vitamin E, which is a potent antioxidant.
on the magic button below and it will take you directly to a shopping cart that contains everything you would need to make it. Once there, you can simply and easily remove any of the items that you already have in your craft stash.
Time for a savoury dish again. It suddenly got very cold here over the weekend so out come the chilies to warm us up. First time I heard about Huevos Rancheros was on Jamie Oliver's TV show 'JAMIE'S AMERICA'. His version of this classic Mexican dish called for the eggs to be poached in the tomato chili sauce rather than top the sauce with a fried egg and this is what we incorporated in to our version as well. This recipe is great for breakfast or when you have brunch with friends as you can prepare the sauce in advance (or even make a lot and freeze some) and then just heat it up and poach your eggs. I am not a big fan of runny egg yolk so mine are usually well done but just cook them for a shorter time if you like them wobbly and runny.
If you have a chance to visit "Fashioning Fashion" at the Resnick Pavilion, be sure to purchase the beautiful book that accompanies the exhibition. It would make a great coffee table book or a very special holiday gift.
Beekman, E. M. “Raymond Chandler and an American Genre.” The Massachusetts Review 14, no. 1 (1973): 149-173.
I didn’t really forget. I just couldn’t figure out a way to paint the side of the vanity that faced the tub. Who was going to see it from that angle anyway? I’ll tell you who, Paul.
It's always interesting to see the top phrases people Google to find me. It's usually several of the 16 & Pregnant couples (Izabella and Jairo are the most popular one). But I've also been found by "men in kilts will kick your ass," "redneck ladies" (please GOD do not let that be someone looking for redneck p*rn because that's kind of what it sounds like to me), and "epic birthday cake."
-I watched Martha Marcy Mae Marlene and became obsessed with Elizabeth Olsen and her haircut, so I copied her and chopped off all my hair, having a lot of fun with my new 'do.
Sponges and guinea pigs these kids are, as this year they’re taking part in a big and exciting experiment to prove that this level of technology can work on a much larger scale. Mrs. Lemon and her classroom have taken a giant leap this year working with her iPads and have laid the groundwork for hopefully continued use of technology in the Natick schools for years to come.
I wouldn't always be friends with me... if it were me....
Paul Krugman, a better economist than political analyst, takes aim at the idea that Obama “overreached by focusing on health care rather than job creation during a severe recession,” but his own chief of staff, Rahm Emanuel, and lesser voices were warning back then that the spectacle of a long, messy fight over a monstrous abortion of a bill, whose effects were in the future, would be a Pyrrhic victory and turn off voters not only on the issue at hand but the workings of government as well.
And it was fantastic!
I am going to start the year with a Thank You card. I created it using Magnolia's Tilda with Candy Cone" from the "Sweet Christmas Dreams Collection 2011". It was coloured with Copics Sketch Markers. I also used Kaiser Craft Paper Pad, Christmas Carnival Collection. The card was embellished with ribbon and Melissa Frances Trinkets & Baubles.
the best reporter I’ve ever known. You get to the heart of the story like
And with the glass empty, spring is unequivocably upon us, bringing the first of the season's Irish beer festivals. Chances are you'll find me down at George's Dock where the St. Patrick's Craft Beer Festival runs until Monday. If you fancy doing your bit to reclaim our national day from a certain foreign multinational corporation, join me there.
Looking back on all the stuff I’ve done so far, I must say I’m incredibly proud of myself. I had no idea I was capable of being so creative. Each and every one of these projects was the result of hard work and determination and I am just elated that I can say that I created them. I really think that it’s hard to be this creative all the time, but when you really force yourself to think out of the box and you make up your mind to do what is asked of you, it really is possible. I know I probably could have done them more on time and with better quality, but there’s always room for improvement. I just hope when you, my audience and peers, see these projects, Kleenex as a brand really does jump out at you, more that the quality of the product. That is the idea behind all of this; Kleenex.
5. Pale Blue Eyes
‘First of all, Kevin, well done! I read your typescript in one sitting – at a gulp – because I was genuinely absorbed by the story…’
There were a total of 15 Boer Republics.
I am totally involved with the characters,
As an Independent Affiliate, you can qualify to earn in the Global Rewards and you can earn on the commissionable volume in your affiliate organization through 9 levels. Dynamic compression is applied.
It's what I'm going to tell myself when I stand up in front of a group of strangers in April to give a presentation at a local museum.
I encourage you to take the harder path... we all know it's easiest to give your AS child what he wants, what he will actually eat, but I promise you- they are not going to fall over dead if they eat a bean.
dry bread everyday...even if it is a slice or two
Just some thoughts on a pretty hectic day...
Sunday morning was a soaker. There was hysteria on the airwaves, accidents and tragedy on the road.
I arrived to my village on a Friday afternoon. The Sunday before, Rashid (age 29) was visiting some of his extended family who lives in my town and saw my host sister on the roof. His mother grew up in this village but moved to Khemisset, the nearest city from here, when she got married many years ago. She and my host mother were childhood friends and when Rashid expressed interest in marrying Fatima-Zahra, his mother approved (his father is now deceased). Rashid’s mother came to the house to confer with my host parents about an engagement. My host parents then asked my host sister what she wanted to do. As Fatima-Zahra put it, “Why not? I don’t have another boyfriend and I want to get married. He has a steady job, house, and makes good money to support me and a family.” So she agreed to an engagement.
Funeral directors in Dover, England said they carried out the last wish of a British man who died from emphysema by placing signs on his hearse reading: "Smoking Killed Me."
The third dream was not positive, I was watching the news on TV, and there was a story about a family (The McDonalds or Mc(Somethings) or something like that) who were attacked in a cinema or theater by a man; and the man escaped, and the police were still looking for the man.
So, I've finished my latest knitting project, with which I'm pleased.
In middle school, I went through that awkward phase where I just tried really hard not to be ugly (it was a losing battle).
But what is this chemical fizz like? Bloody lovely. Fruity, fizzy with a nice thicker mouthfeel you don’t quiet get from real proper alcopops. If an alcopop is a sorbet, this is a scoop of ice cream. One of these days I might bother to try an actual sour lambic beer but as the popular style is to fruit them up to make them palatable I’m not looking forward to it. It’s the sugar and the chemicals that make it so nice.
Who is The Prisoner now? It's the copyright owner. But the "village" is bigger than that. Generated by the writers, actors, musicians, the "village" is in danger, too. Sure, George Clooney is rich. But the staff on a movie set are not. So what happens. Clooney's movie is given away on every torrent. He still gets a fortune and his CEO's do. But union members get laid off, and the grips, the make-up assistants, the guys who shlep scenery…don't get work because the jobs are farmed out to Canada or Romania somewhere, and staffed by minimum-wagers, just like the ones at the Nike and Apple factories in China. California movie union people are as screwed as guys picking lettuce in a field in Barstow. It goes overseas. Or not at all; notice how few movies are being made. How few TV shows. How few albums. It's reality shows, cheap cartoons and a bunch of rap assholes using auto-tune and ProTools. "Find a new paradigm."
“I await your reply. Did it happen just when
Since the introduction of the Australian government's maternity reform package, new career opportunities are being opened up for midwives who want to practise privately. Midwives have obtained their Medicare eligibility notation, and hung up their shingles (set up web pages and social media sites). Here's a quick overview of what is required to get to this point in a midwifery career:
A friend told me how much he loves them & I see so many other running friends who just cant speak enough about them. I figured I would try them.. especially because I hate running shoes on the treadmill - they just feel 'clunky' on them so that's going to be a starting point for me. I'm definitely sticking with my Saucony's for the race in 2 weeks.
I had to straighten and move things to make room for it. Which made alley's and tunnels for bunnies to run and hide. Dammit and Betty had a fine time making plans that first night.
Yeah Yeah, EVERYONE loves dogs, I’m nothing special. Oh wait, I am. I creep people out on a regular basis as I approach them with a huge smile and say, “hey cute stuff.”
Here are the Car Keys!
The law is ruling overtime in China, and doing so under several spotlights that cast it in an uneven light.
You don’t have to look down
latest urdu news,urdu newspaper,daily urdu news, Islamic news,urdu khabrain,Islamic urdu site,urdu sites,world news,india Pakistan news,Arabic country news, urdu news, urdu articles, urdu magazine, urdu in devnagri, urdu ghazal, urdu poetry,urdu website,
The rising ladder tore out the overhead wires and put out the electricity and disconnected the telephones in a ten-square city block area (but they did get the house fire out).
MacLennan also throughout the book contemplates what it means to be Canadian: Neither a (U.S.) American nor British. But must a Canadian define himself only by what he is not? And what is Canada's destiny in the world? A bridge between its southern neighbor and the Old World, perhaps. He ponders whether Canada would rise to be one of the great nations of the world after Europe exhausted itself in war.
Choline Bitartrate – See Lecithin.
I'm a fan of Graham Sanders' podcast "Craft Brewer Radio." A few weeks ago, he gave a recipe for a beer he liked. He wound up injuring himself during the course of the brew day, hence the name of the beer. His was a lager, but mine will be an ale, using some clean fermenting ale yeast.
A couple things in the works. I'm going to try to secure a teaching "gig" at the Colorado Free University about beer. It won't (really can't) be too in-depth, but hopefully it will create a buzz. My reviews have surpassed the 840 mark and the rate is picking up as I finally have a car (no, not to drink and drive, but now I can go to the big stores far away and purchase the goods). The release party of Avery's Maharaja IPA is this Friday, so I'll be hitting that.
Do you know what you would talk about at a dinner party where work talk was forbidden – with colleagues, no less? It was an eye-opening experience. I was reminded of my summer spent in France, when I had to learn how to introduce myself without referencing my profession. They just don’t like to talk about work over there – at least, not until a relationship has been established. To hijack a social encounter with professional talk is considered rude. I remember the feeling of profound cognitive dissonance when a certain man (with kind eyes and a nice smile) put a finger to my lips, silencing my chatter, and asked me to tell him who I was – not what I did. I found his question incredibly difficult to answer, and not just because of the language barrier.
And, here is the result :
returns to the common source.
(Legal in Arkansas, Mississippi, and Alabama)
The number of mothers who smoked fell from 25.4% to 18.8% after the new law was brought in, researchers discovered.
Location: House in Pao
Any other books in the works? Goals for future projects?
3. Post a link to our giveaway on Facebook and leave the link in the comments below.
The papers and edge punch are from stampin up,The heart die cut is made using a memory box die,The fantastic ribbon buckle,organza ribbon,charms,buttons and pearls are all from meiflower crafts.
I used: Echo Park 'Victoria Gardens' papers... and that's it!! I made the stars with auto-shapes in MS Word. With the busy papers, no other embellishment was needed, though I couldn't resist a touch of K-style doodling around the edges.
A Mexican woman claims to be pregnant with nine babies – just months after she gave birth to triplets.
We were at a kiddy birthday party some months ago and either the Brat or the Bean ( I forget which one) came running out screaming, ’We’re playing doctor and look what X is doing to Y’. All of us parents froze in that one second and you could feel the tension in the room. Playing doctor? Thankfully we were all sensible enough not to rush into the room together and make a big deal. Another parent and I casually strolled into the nursery and the rest waited nervously for news.
-ad networks - requirements, recommendations,etc
“In the aftermath of the Quiet Revolution, they didn’t know how to respond and quite how to read the Church’s role in society,” he said.
I learned way more about vampires in one night than I ever wanted to know in the space of ten lifetimes. o_O I hate to say this, but it was kinda intriguing. I mean, there were vampires before Twilight, people..... they were actually interesting once. :P They're actually pretty sad. I want to write some weird redemptive vampire story now.....
...Thus, Article I gives Congress only certain legislative powers “herein granted,” Articles II and III check those powers, and the Tenth Amendment emphasizes that all other powers remain with those who breathed life into the new government in the first place: the sovereign “people of the United States.” The Framers believed that limiting federal power, and reserving the “residual” power in the hands of the states and the people would help “ensure protection of our fundamental liberties” and “reduce the risk of tyranny and abuse.”
So, I’ve been reading a kindle. You know me—this is a shocking event. Family members come into the room where I’m reading and stop in stunned disbelief, saying I look weird reading that little piece of plastic.
Shoes - Clarks (Wear 1)
Her friend rushed into the reception area on foot for help as Miss Davis's asthma attack worsened, but was told to call an ambulance. By the time she returned to the car, the Liverpool University student had collapsed. She later died at the Royal.
But I got the bronchitis last week and went to the doctor. They did some tests and have determined I have COPD as well. They gave me anti-biotics and some kind of inhaler.
The taste is much better then in the oven! Should I make a blogpost
I am not a Christian but all of this is enough to make me wish Jesus would come back right this instant and yank so many of his followers' heads out of their asses. But I have a hunch we're just going to have to let this play out, and the ride is not going to be one of joy.
I love my Karate Ali,
2 medium/large tomatoes
When I found out how endangered they were and that someone was trying to help, I decided to give 10% of product sales to those helping with their recovery.
We have Martin and Sarah this afternoon with baby Liliya...perhaps they'll distract me sufficiently to be able to recall my first thoughts and feelings of today.
Which is why I forgot the very thing that made me write the SINCE I BECAME A MOM post, the one thing that triggered my mind into thinking about all the things that have changed...it just flew right out of my head. And believe it or not, wine did not have anything to do with me forgetting...this time. =)
Hungover
Top Copyright Photo: Mark Durbin.
But ... for now, I'm working on a holiday palette ruled mostly by greens and whites ... okay, a few pops of red may show up here or there. Coming soon!
You gotta fly, fly, fly, way off the ground.
I still find myself a little bit crazy for volunteering to take on such a feat as the youth group, but I realize that they’re worth it. Trust me, in the last week, I’ve had some freakouts about things like in particular the 30 Hour Famine. I’m finding that I’m really bad at event planning. Is there a class on this somewhere? I even wanted to give up, but there’s something that won’t let me give up and I think it has a lot to do with my passion for the teens at my church. I can’t give up on them. That and I got the 30 Hour Famine box the other day, which renewed my strength that yes, I can do this somehow, some way.
Ah, but you were right it was perfect as I got in behind the wheel.
The March Round Robin challenge is almost over as week 4 layouts will be posted on Monday. It's been such an adorable challenge using baby pictures as the twist. I was just squealing with cute overload when I saw Christy's sweet layout featuring her daughter:
its sap was known to have natural healing properties to calm an upset stomach –
I also discovered that there are actually Tamil digits that have been put into Unicode. You can see them here. (And here too) I don’t know about Tamil digits much, but aren’t most of these Tamil letters as well? Now, the Unicode character code points are different, but how can the reader know the difference? For instance, the Tamil digit 1 (௧) has Unicode code point U+0BE7 and the character “ka” (க) has the Unicode code point U+0B95 but can you spot it? They are essentially the same character! Maybe you need to specifically indicate you’re writing a number, just to avoid confusion! But then again, like Sinhala digits, I doubt anyone ever uses them! Well maybe a few eccentric people do…
On Monday evening I was invited to the launch of the Chic 2012 restaurant guide. Chic? I confess. I’d never heard of it so it was with great intrigue that I attended the event. There was one small hitch in the launch. The guide itself hadn’t been printed in time so as I write I am awaiting my copy in the post but in the meantime I decided to find out a little bit more about these charming chefs and not least their cooking capabilities at Monday’s aperitivo.
For about a month now there has been at least one call a day asking about how the thermostat works. No amount of explanation sticks. It is a butt simple digital version with 2 numbers, the Set number and the Room's temperature. There is Up and down Buttons for changing the target temperature in the Set, and a switch to go from Fan Auto to Fan On. And of course the Heat/Off/Cool switch.
When they do a good things:pat, kiss, day thankyou, duaa
Purple loosestrife
Slice pound cake into cubes; set aside.
But we cannot simply put the words “pursue your passions” in a cookie jar up on the shelf and expect our kids to take a bite - “Hey, pursue your passions, they’re right up there.” We need to put those words into action ourselves, so that our children can see that passions, and learning, and joyful living are not pursuits for only children. The passion that we all model for our children needs to be unconditional - a true reflection of ourselves and our values, our likes, and our beliefs. THAT's what we're modeling - not the values themselves, but the joy of having and expressing them.
III. IBM would be easier to work with, would recommit to quality and re-establish its leadership position.
This is only one of the ones out there right now; they are the Pacific Crisis Fundraiser. There are so many talented designers that have put out great products for people to come buy at this location and for most of the vendors 100% of the money from the item purchased will go to the charity Americares.
11:31 - your head explodes.
THIS MORNING
I finished it all off with some tape made by seven gypsies on the bottom.
enjoy the rest of your weekend everyone and good luck with the candy
Fishing is hard work for the bears. The water in Brooks River is ice cold and the current is strong. So every now and then, the bears take a break. And a favorite place to park a furry rump is on one of the many giant boulders in the middle of a stream bed.
New deployment maneuvers from both armies. The pikemen are slowly forming into a square, back to back. The vikingr are trying to push from all sides. (Please ignore the hecklers appearing in the far right... They are up to no good.)
But nooo! You had to start some random arc with a whole bunch of random characters with random backstories and random superpowers and royally screw up the flow of the story!
Free to move on and embrace the life that God has for me. Free to take on the past and prepare for the future. Free to enjoy what life has to offer. Free to be me.
Among Occupy’s main targets will be the five largest banks, which control a greater share of the economy today than they did on the eve of the financial crisis. With dozens of bank occupations likely to happen, May Day illustrates how the movement has become better organized. But so have the banks. In New York and Chicago, they’ve pooled resources to gather intelligence on protesters. One security consultant likened the cooperation to elks circling against a pack of wolves.
4 Ahau: Food scarcities. Half the katun good, half bad. The return of Kukulkan
Menma: You will? It’s such late?
possibilities
If you have any questions about wool please feel free to e-mail me, smmumma at gmail dot com and I will do my best to help you out!
No spectacular belly flops this time in the race for gold. Germany easily takes gold and Japan wins silver.
The only complaint I have is the switching of POVs can be confusing at times, but you get the rhythm down after a while. I almost wonder if the named chapter aspect from Game of Thrones would have been another element to pick-up on, especially as this story seems likely to widen its cast in the next volume of this proposed trilogy.
Now, don't get me wrong, I think pregnancy is a beautiful process created by God to bring forth children into the world, but any woman who tells you that pregnancy is all beautiful and wonderful needs to be taken outside and slapped around for a bit. I mean, seriously! You missed being pregnant so much that you're already thinking about another baby!??! Really, lady? Perhaps instead of another baby, a straight jacket would be a better alternative. Because clearly YOU ARE CRAZY!
I got this recipe from The Pioneer Woman, who has some incredibly tasty recipes. I simply adapted it to be vegan & crock pot friendly! (Her recipe calls for chicken, chicken broth, whole milk, cheese & it is cooked on a stove top.)
needs love
(though off sides, apparently)
Ultimately, I’m hoping that teens will relate to her because of her dark side.
The lady behind me smiled and looked at my son like he was a roll of Charmin and wanted to squeeze him for being so polite.
"Did your Joseph know it?"
Which brings us back to that issue of the state, an ideal and an institution that has been picked at for its myriad cumulative deficiencies in the later-part of the twentieth -century, without currently receiving much by way of positive endorsement and/or legitimation.
This includes books like Twilight, as far as I'm concerned. If you've read it, sure, talk about the weak prose, the recycled ideas and the creepy relationship. If you haven't read it, you are basically talking out of your ass. How do you know that you'll concur with the opinion of others? It might become your favourite book ever.
1/3 cup Biscoff spread
'The second surprise was the high temperature they discovered in the earth's center. 'The calculations indicate the given temperature was about 1,100 degrees Celsius, or over 2,000 degrees Fahrenheit,' Azzacov pointed out. 'This is far more then we expected. It seems almost like an inferno of fire is brutally going on in the center of the earth.
It’s just a filler episode but we do find out the gender of Marshall and Lily’s baby. You’d also notice how close Barney and Robin are in this episode, though Kevin (Kal Penn) plays Robin’s boyfriend. I really have this gut feeling that Barney marries Robin. Just saying.
Here they are settling in for another day chez All Things Bright & Beautiful :)
Well, starting in 2011, we're going to do just that (thought let's not call it a resolution). Others have suggested also trying to enter more club members' beers into sanctioned competition, which we hope to do, too.
“There are nine different woods sacred to the Druids which they use to build these fires,” my king answered, edging closer to me as the raven masked one gave me a long lingering look accompanied by a sexy smile. I smiled back, unable to resist.
bacon recipe courtesy of: Michael Symons, The Chew, ABC-TV
For starters, it will put me on the path of good hydration every day, plus it will start my body off cleansing and detoxifying. Here's a good article on water and hydration from the people at The Biggest Loser if you're looking for a little more information.
“Our parents responded to my sister’s anger in a way that frightened me further. I also felt tremendous guilt for not being able to prevent the horrors that my sister endured. Once she was ‘classified’ as a psychiatric patient, she was lost. Everything that was done to her in the name of ‘treatment’ seemed to me to be a form of ongoing abuse and torture.
So, for those who wonder how we can bear to live no less seventy days and nights (that's ten weeks, or two and a half months) without the sun's cheery glow, all I can say is Jesus is truly the Light of our home.
Oscar, a baby chimp, is nurtured by his fiercely protective mom Isha. As is true with most moms, she tries to teach her son everything she can so that he can take care of himself when the time comes for him to be on his own. Unfortunately, that comes much sooner than expected.
For the filling:
Normally I believe it is best to choose someone in the second half of life; roughly thirty-five or older.
3. How often do you communicate with home and how?
tussled what was left of my hair and whistled.
* My blissful visit to the canyon area of Dinosaur National Monument. I pretty much had the place to myself and got to enjoy my hike and the stunning views at the end of it in absolute silence. Well, except for when the swallows would occasionally whooooosh by on hunting runs. What a great day! (And Crocs are great-- and quiet--for easy hikes, by the way!)
One thing that I have noticed is that since I think I know when to anticipate ovulation, I have been less objective when recording signs with CM, etc. In fact, I was so convinced I knew the day ahead of time, that I recorded fertile CM about 3 days prior to O day, then realized later that I was wrong, maybe just wishful thinking. I suppose it's a learning experience.
12:40 p.m. Thursday, July 14; home in Albuquerque for the first time since mid-May. NICE!!
Abdullah said that civil servants should change their mindset to deliver services speedily, bearing in mind that they should play the role of facilitators and partners of the people and the private sector.
He said, "I'm Tom Smith." The entire congregation held its breath.
So what about the prize this week.
Significantly, even those with life insurance are eager to learn more. More than four out of five (83 percent) said they would be interested in adding additional features to their existing policies such as coverage for LTC needs, a feature that would allow them to receive a life insurance payout if they were diagnosed with a terminal disease or a waiver of premium payments if they became disabled. Only 10 percent said their advisors recommended LTCi.
Back in the mother land the fear is drummed up in color coded charts just to remind you of how terrified you’re supposed to be of maybe getting C.I.A developed anthrax in the mail post marked “From Muslim Extremist With Love” right there on the front. Quick! While the people are frozen in fear and unified in blind wrath we shall offer them the illusion of safety! We shall give them the Patriot Act! By God, it will be the perfect snake eating all of its tail before it eats all of him scenario! It will protect the constitution by completing nullifying the constitution. We shall preserve their rights by taking them away. The weepy part of all this is that this little bait and switch worked.
Responsible for reporting bail information to the police
As you view your own situation of depression. Consider whether it might actually be a loneliness for more of the Lord. Think about your own ‘low spot’, emptiness, and lack. Are they something God can’t fill? Contemplate these things, and in your desperate moments when things appear hopeless—say, ‘Give me more, Lord. More of You. I thirst.’
Twas the Night ... Disney XD ... 5 PM
...and why I can never come back again...
My own book links (on the right sidebar and elsewhere) point to Amazon. I'm not removing those links yet because it would be very tedious to take them all down and put them back up if Amazon does the right thing-- which I very much hope they will do, quickly. But I will ask that if you do buy my books, please buy them from BN.com or elsewhere in the meantime.
As the ecstasy washed over me, I opened my eyes. I see you smiling over me.
Fortunately the case will be decided in a court of law, not by public opinion.
I had a conversation with a lovely gentleman in the finance department of Kobo and we looked over the documentation together.
Quite similar but then again different, I chose to wear the black on black with golden details a few days before London Fashion Week started. This time, and just because I thought it's much more casual this way, I put on my beloved Vintage fur vest and combined two very decisive, long awaited for, classic orange details...! And just because I felt like it (and because I recognised that my hair decided to have a bad day), I started to curl it for the first time completely without any help from professionals at Selfridges or any other person desperately trying it on them.
The problems, and there are many. Begin with feel good politics. You can rely on technology only so far, but ask any security professional for a real answer in preventing terrorism in the skies and they will tell you profiling.
In declarations to bwin, Esteban Granero said:
The taste, the texture, and the fact that no butter or oil is needed to make a batch sold me.
He died last year. He had endured that life for six years. He was found one morning on the mountainside lying quite peacefully as though he had died in his sleep. From where he lay he had been able to see those two great rocks called the Faraglioni which stand out of the sea. It was full moon and he must have gone to see them by moonlight. Perhaps he died of the beauty of that sight…
Stir for 10-15 minutes. At the very last step, add tablespoon of condensed milk. This is purely optional (and not too orthodox-Purist) but I find that it thickens and sweetens the potion quite perfectly.
Mothers, take good care of your daughters. Be close to them. Listen to them. Talk with them. Lead them from doing foolish things. Guide them into doing the right thing. See that they dress in a comely and modest fashion. Safeguard them from the terrible evils that are all about them.
Also, this waffle works in any kind of waffle maker.
I rang up again.
Hang on the Box – Asshole, I’m Not Your Baby
We'll be running this in several chunks between now and the book release this winter. Because these things have a hard start/stop point, August is a ramp-up phase. There'll be a lot of content coming out, but the experience really gets underway at the end of the month… just in time to distract the kids from their schoolwork.
We start this recipe by gathering the red, ripe berry clusters from staghorn sumac (Rhus typhina) shrubs. The berries are actually very hard and inedible, and it is the acidic and tart malic, oxalic, and ascorbic acids that we will be harvesting from the outside of the berries to use. In about a half gallon of room temperature water, we add 12 clusters. I'll crush the clusters up under the water and swish them about, then allow the concoction to sit for a few hours. The now pink liquid is strained through a coffee filter to remove fine hairs and other debris, and tasted for tartness. To make a stronger concentrate, add some new sumac berry clusters to this same liquid and allow them to sit for another few hours, then strain again. This concentrate is ready to use, or can be frozen in ice cube trays to add to water or save for the winter. We also use this concentrate in the place of lemon juice in some jelly recipes.
The vast majority of theologians in Catholic institutions in Europe, North America, and Australasia would reject most or all of these teachings. These theologians are followed by the majority of religious orders and a substantial part of the bishops in these areas. It would be difficult, for example, to find a Jesuit teaching theology in any Jesuit institution who would accept a single one of them. The texts above are only a selection from the teachings of Vatican II that are rejected by these groups; they could be extended to many times the number.
23. Full Moon - Elvira
3/4 Tsp Baking Powder
How to Set the Alarm on the Casio G-Shock Watches
EVEN the bravest that are slain
We appear to be a nation engrosed with Belle de Jour and her saucy tales of S and M for we desire a mentally deficient crag of rock to beat us before taking us against our will and charging us for the pleasure.
I am hoping to have all my editing and logging done by end of play Tuesday so that I just need to put the whole thing together.
The “mysterious poetic fragment known as Kubla Khan” was, according to Coleridge’s own account, “composed under the influence of laudanum.” In Xanadu did Kubla Khan a state pleasure dome decree . . . . (Below is the complete text should you ever want to read it all the way through.)
and, of course, in reality, i’ve never fallen off any train platforms. nor have i ever been pushed down the stairs. and thus far, i haven’t sustained any serious injuries from a stubbed toe, and neither have i found myself any clumsier for being pregnant (at least as far as i know), but i think that i’ve gotten incredibly paranoid – as evidenced by my ridiculously realistic imaginings of the business man behind me rushing forward and pushing me down, trampling me in his mad dash (to get where, i’m not sure) and leaving me lying there, alone and in pain.
The people who gave those arahan have said and done nothing to show they are truly sorry for what happened, but instead have exerted continuous pressure on editors to play down all reporting of injuries and injustices suffered by journalists.
What happens when Mothers feel the guilt and pressure of being the best mother they can? We crack, we get depressed, feel angry, upset that we are not doing as good as we could. This is magnified too for many mothers who feel isolated.
Then, we had a day of really nice weather!
Sometimes the way seems cloudy and the assignments seem too large, but just know that if God called you for it then he has already placed within you everything you need to get the job done. You are already anointed for it.
As a confirmation of that, the word used by Paul in verses 51 and 52 in 1 Cor. 15 actually means EXCHANGE.
Psalm 49:15 also says: But God will redeem my life from the grave; he will surely take me to himself.
Meet Murphy:
GK: Steve, LB: Dan Allen, CB: Kev Willsher (Paul Dyke), CB: Sam Hewitt, RB: Mark Reeves, LM: Sam Schwodler, CM: Mark Sanderson, CM: Martyn Barnett, CM: Ali Ingram, (Lee Fielder) RM: Chris Pye, CF: Ben Rowe
to supersede
Lycos dropped the term “tattoos” from it’s Poll because the term was so popular. According to Lycos, tattoos rarely drops out of the top ten search terms requested on the Internet and Lycos dropped the term because they wanted to make room for other searches.
Legal experts are now looking at this matter and both Mr Aman, who has accused Sarawak Report of defamation and UBS should have plenty of concerns about how they are going to set about explaining the millions of dollars that wended around the world, including the United States, on their way to Zurich.
A6 Goody Goody Bye Bye
caramelised pumpkin, eggplant & feta tart – 17
Starting with a couple of his early water lilies (1904) and then moving across a twenty-year span to his later work (1924), the progression of his painting style – from water lilies to a Japanese bridge to a climbing rose archway – is breathtaking. At first he uses fine, detailed dots of paint typical of the Impressionist artists, but then his hand loosens up, the dots become brushstrokes, and colours merge into a whirl of rich blues, greens, oranges and rust-reds.
The twelveth picture is of my great uncle, Will, and second cousin, Eldon, on my dad’s side of the family. The car? Hmmmm.
Where did I acquire this spirit or hard work? Definitely my parents! Through years of watching my parents work, stay up till all hours at times to get things done, numerous potlucks and events at church that needed chairs & tables set up, tablecloths folded back up, kitchens cleaned up, committees, counting offering, charity drives, delivering boxes of food to the needy, service projects, etc. Teaching me how a family sticks together during hard times. I have worked with my family doing janitorial service at car dealerships, paper routes, cataloguing pictures for display albums, adding beads to gowns, babysitting kids for bridal parties, catching doves that didn’t end up flying away at wedding receptions, running errands, moving a camera store to a new location, etc. I know I resented having to do some of those things at the time. Today, I know I am a better person today for having done those things.
Last but not least is Lindsey over at The Teacher Wife. Lindsey has awesome units she has created for TpT. She is very inspiring and creative! She does not have a button that I could find. I guess she is in the same boat as I am. I am actually not quite sure how to create a button. If anyone has some tips, PLEASE share!
I would imagine that many, if not most Antifa groups have some sort of web presence or are at least active enough on Indymedia and other similar sites to be able to provide a point of contact for those who are interested in getting involved. Face-to-face contacts and recruitment will be viable in areas with visible Antifa groups. However, the most interesting questions with respect to Antifa recruitment are those that pertain to screening and depth of access.
I am an animal person. Not the sort who kisses their dog or shares a bed with them. (Cal and I have had too many babies/sick toddlers share our bed over the years, so there’s no way we’re sharing the bed with an animal.) And I’m allergic to most animals. But I am an animal person.
SHEAN: Oh, Mr. Gallagher. Oh Mr. Gallagher.
Have a blessed week!
everyone now a days want to get paid for ANYTHING that they do that does not concern them! wow…. where in the world have the morals and ethics gone! its 2010 and people are less giving than they were 20 years ago! its all about the “me -me” syndrome..
You can shop on Ideeli.com from outside the USA even, if you want your purchases to be shipped outside the USA. You need to get a virtual address in the USA using a service like Shipito.
Questions are now being asked about the minister’s motives for doing so. Sources told City Press they were convinced Mthethwa was desperately trying to “save his own skin”.
Now would be a good time to promote a new movie that seeks to correct decades of dishonest liberal spin on civil rights.
FOWCL = Fall out of Wheelchair Laughing!!
(BEGIN VIDEOTAPE)
I wanted my personal scrap room in order and I did accomplish that, complete with paint and shelves and new light fixtures and all...... it's a challenge to keep it tidy but most days I can see at least a bit of the table top and the days I have spent in that room scrapping with friends have been amazing....
In addition to my YouTube channel I also have an account on another, lesser-known video website called Vimeo that isn't so uptight about things. They get less search traffic and I'm limited in how much I can upload weekly but I still get to post my stuff on Facebook and share it with my friends. It's been fun reading all the positive feedback and seeing how many channel subscribers I'm getting, much the same as I get a kick out of the positive comments and subscribers & readers I have here.
5) Add egg and knead in circular motion with low pressure until it come together and look like a ball. Dough should not be dry it should has some shine after kneading.
The sixth chakra, our “third eye”, situated between the eyebrows, helps us to see accurately in life. It helps us to hear and understand what is really being said, hearing the meaning behind the words. The center also helps us to analyze, perceive and visualize what is going on in the world. “In conjunction with the pituitary gland this center enhances our memory, our dream state, and our ability to learn intellectually.” Pg 175
That's what I love about blogging, one post leads to another slightly different and then another and before you know it you're in territory you would have never guessed you'd be going.
Situation C:
“You have family there?” I asked.
He knew that with time, he would be able to make a place for himself in her heart. With time, he would make her believe on his love for her. With time, she WOULD fall in love with him.
Drink coffee, lose weight, and feel great!
(Jamie is feeling my abs.)
And what about the millions of criminal and sub-criminal psychopaths who get away with “lesser crimes,” of duping, manipulating, stalking, raping and defrauding countless victims in ways that are less obvious or difficult to catch and prosecute? How will they pay for their crimes and other wrongdoings? What justice will their tens of millions of victims find? Are their victims, who may be out of their life savings, with broken hearts, in poor health as a result of the psychopaths’ actions to suffer from a sense of injustice and betrayal for the rest of their lives? I say: NO. Why? Because even if the psychopaths may get away with their crimes and wrongdoings from a legal standpoint, they live the kind of lives that no healthy person would ever desire. Their lives are a nightmare.
Where: Sweet E’s Bake Shop, 1417 S. Robertson Blvd, Los Angeles, CA 90035
Super-fast 51-point AF system has 4 Dynamic AF modes, including 3D Focus tracking for identifying, locking onto, and capturing razor sharp images of fast-moving sports and action subjects.
4. Head back to the captain (picture 2), who mentions the decoder is in the swamp behind his old house. Where's his house? In Katon!
A total Big Pharma cesspool of money, influence and quackery
By which we hear the songs of birds,
Hops: NA
Marquis de Sade: Mademoiselle Hotpants! Sex without pain is like food without taste!
Nutella
There is some bits of me that aren't the least bit middle aged.
“Well, as I remember it, Mr. Baines was the chair of the local draft board. He was a businessman of some means and well-positioned to sway the other members’ opinions, quite the literal first among equals. Then one day he tried to use that power, much to his sorrow.”
Here we have a new model for choosing Session members. And really there are days when drawing lots makes as much sense as any other nomination process I have seen. However I remember noting in a seminary assignment that in verses 22-23 Peter lays out some criteria for an apostle and that Paul (who takes up a remarkable amount of time in the book of Acts) does not meet those criteria. Not. At. All.
I placed an order for some MFT dies last night and now I'm anxiously waiting for them to arrive in the mail so I can create some more things with them!! Two of them are the Rolled Flower dies, and I am Excited to see what they're like! :) Too bad they didn't get here before the MFT Wednesday Stamp Club's challenge!! :)
09 - As it Began, I Looked to the Sky 4:31
What do you think makes for a successful picture book that young children will love and want to read again and again?
I will come from far away
*** Water: I’m sure you know the rule: 8 glasses a day. Water keeps your body working properly, gives you energy and makes you feel satiated. For a “treat” I’ll mix in a glass of bubbly water into the line-up.
Today, at Marie's, we sealed the corners and cracks in the pantry. Marie's been putting it off. That's the point of this extended visit. I'm helping her do some projects, and she'll spend a week with me later this summer helping me with some projects. It wasn't really bad with two people. She mixed the goop, which had to be done in small batches because it sets up in about five minutes, and I troweled it into the spaces.
So it's time to rummage around in an embellishment drawer. There we go: a few flowers from the stash. . .spritz them with a bit of gold glimmer mist so they match the ribbon, add a glimmer brad and a pearl for the centers and we're all set!
Some plastic or cardboard to cover the surface on which you’re painting
I wish someone would tell the British weather as much, because today, May Day, was more like an alarm call than a jump into summer time.
This will be a new adventure for me...for us. And I can't wait. So please come visit me friends...even if it's the "east side" :)
I must admit it comes as a surprise.
At the Heart of the Heart of Me
The enthusiastic celebrations of events like Holi, Dandia, Diwali, Krishnashtami and painting competitions brought the entire IWSB community together as a family.
“So what has been tried since then?”
Let’s talk a bit about the album you have out – Red in tooth and claw.
1. Brain storming for essay that will be written Thursday/Friday. Topic: Compare and Contract how did Christianity impede or promote societal change during the Middle Ages.
Yet there are moments when she reveals a delicate presence onscreen that could blossom under the right director — such that as an actor I’d like to see her truly develop into a 40-something actress who feels comfortable in her own skin.
and will then ‘pop-up’ as entirely self-contained, story-based, collaborative workshops
Chad Troutwine is a decorated entrepreneur, trained attorney, and education pioneer. He is the co- founder and CEO of Veritas Prep, the largest privately-owned GMAT preparation and graduate school admissions consulting company in the world. Chad is also the co- founder of Spectrum Station, one of the Midwest’s largest early childhood education centers. Since 2003, Chad has produced ten feature films starring more than a dozen Academy Award winning actors and directors. He is also the co-founder of Freakonomics Media, a digital partnership with author Stephen Dubner and economist Steven Levitt.
And yet, here I am, on WordPress. Just blogging. Speaking of which, I just read an article that gave me some helpful, albeit simple and obvious, blogging tips and it made me realize that I need to completely reconsider my whole approach to blogging. I need to spend more time writing, developing, and editing my posts. I’m finding, though, that the the country music is really helping me focus right now–even if I am focusing on the distraction (blogging) rather than what I should be doing (studying).
Okay this will make my point. The picture that is..Here are my 7 Fashion Tips. Did I ever mention that I was in the fashion industry for about 20 years, in design, merchandising and sales and marketing..so now you know..
He was five days older than me, and my best friend. Two doors separated our apartments and we came and went as we pleased without knocking. Our parents worked and we had keys on strings around our necks that let us in after school. Lemon Cooler cookies and milk didn’t taste the same unless Jeff was sharing them with me at the table.
Well, as the title suggests, sometimes you need to go with the flow. I was originally going to post this for Monday morning and then for this morning, yet the lovely thing called life got in the way.
If we’re sensitive to the truth of this world, it means we see a lot of pain. And that kind of exposure can take its toll. It leaves those artists worn out and tired and tender. But it hopefully leaves them astute enough to describe the lay of the land (the “sad terrain” as Bill says) to all of us brave enough to take heed and traverse this dangerous world.
Le Guin’s prose and research feel effortless; there are some hauntingly beautiful lines in here, such as “I felt that night that to have known such fulfillment was to be, in some part of my being, forever safe from absolute despair, from the ruin of the soul. Joy my shield” (214). She mentions in the afterword the reconstruction she had to do (and had to get help with) in order to get a handle on the geography of Lavinia’s world, and it’s quite extensive. She knows it well and she uses it without ever succumbing to Worldbuilder’s Disease, which I truly appreciate. But the structure of the piece strikes me as a little off-kilter. The majority of the novel deals with Lavinia changing, in whatever way she can, her own marital destiny for Aeneas, whom she’s chosen. (Well… more on that in a bit.) But once the two settle down, the novel briskly trots through the rest of her life, glossing over battles and wars when it can. While I appreciate the inversion of a text that I gather is quite focused on the battles and the wars, it just seems to trail off, especially given Lavinia’s awareness of her own fictionality.
Mystery Photographer is the sort of guy who has all he needs in the world. He has his bag, his clothes, his books, his laptop, his phone, his hair gel, and his gal. I realize that men are hard to shop for, but geez--when I've finally met the guy who turns me on while wearing short and sneakers and baseball caps and everything else I stupidly thought wasn't awesome, well. I'm fracked.
the wind
Chris Martin
Luz's soccer season has started and she has two games each weekend, so that is one more thing that I'm involved with. I'm SO blessed that my grandbabies live so close and I CAN be involved in all their doings! And SOON Luz will be starting the horseback riding lessons I got her for Christmas! Oh bOy! We can't WAIT for that!
it's all you'll see of them,
If it sounds like something you'd like to do, run on over to one of the hosting blogs and sign up in the linky! Hope you see you there!
For the past few months, I have been working behind the scenes here on something that I am finally able to announce: starting tonight, and lasting for the next seven days, I will be helping to lead a Los Angeles-based design "super-workshop" with a spectacular line-up of participants.
Earthling celebrates 25 years of Clive Barker’s Weaveworld with the definitive edition of this dark fantasy masterwork. Weaveworld: 25th Anniversary Edition will be released late 2012 in a modest print run consisting of gift, numbered, and lettered editions:
3) If you are a new follower, welcome!!! Let me know and you will get four extra entries!
Why is Jackson grounded? Did I miss something here?!
Please read this article if you’d like to get a clearer view of a photographer’s business. Although truly, this only just touches the surface of what is typically involved.)
As a broader reflection, the more I read about 1968, the more it seems like a fiction. It’s not hard to imagine being completely overwhelmed if you had to live through that. Your government was sending people to die in Vietnam, cities (long places of American glory) were burning, promising leaders of the future were being killed, and everything seemed to be in upheaval. Oh, and then you picked Nixon. Is that the year we spun off course as a country? Would our country have been noticeably different today if that year hadn’t been so awful? Probably. More likely, the wheels and gears were set in motion years before. Yet it sure seems like 1968 did something to our psyche that still leaves us still in need of a national therapy session.
We went to dozens of baseball, softball, and hockey games. We enjoyed many an evening, relaxing in our backyard while toasting marshmallows over a crackling fire pit. We even went camping in the tent I pitched in our family room. What? There were no mosquitoes or bears, and we had running water and air conditioning! I’m telling ya, that’s the way to camp!
Multi-mediated Brecht
Police helicopters buzzed overhead on Saturday morning as protesters gathered. Reuters correspondents saw about 200 riot police stationed in the square and five water cannons heading to the site where Malaysia declared independence from Britain.
Brouwerij St. Bernardus NV St. Bernardus Tripel
Jon interviewed a woman who lost her flat and – with the exception of one flute – all her possessions in the riots. “She felt she was being punished.” Jon said. ”She sensed trouble was brewing and she and her partner left their flat and drove away.” The one flute she managed to save was already in the car. There were eighteen other flutes in the flat, some of which had been customised and cost tens of thousands of pounds each. ”They were in a pub on the other side of town when they saw their own flat burning on television.”
The end result was a whole new stash of chipboard shapes. I found that I reached for them quite a bit because I just love the new color.
It was heartbreaking to get the call from the bride telling me the wedding was moving indoors. She sounded so sad. I could tell that the dream of her outdoor wedding was gone. But it was also a relief that I wouldn't have to wear mittens while playing or bundle up or worry about the harp getting rained on, going out of tune or breaking strings because of the weather.
Stasis Form
whenever you face trials of any kind,
Randomly inserted into packs at one in 18, this set features the first game-used pieces of bat cards for each player. Card backs carry the player's intials as numbering. Cards with a SP designation are short-print.
and makes eye contact
2.) Don't open up your food processor right away - wait about 10 minutes for everything to settle so you don't end up breathing in the detergent dust (just trust me on that one...).
What I say to end the conversation: It IS a scary thing to think you are going to get pregnant right away and then it doesn’t happen.
Did you know that when the Americans invaded Panama in 1989 and surrounded the Vatican Embassy where he was holed up in an operation called "Nifty Package" U.S. Navy Seals blasted rock music at deafening levels in an attempt to get him to surrender? Do you know what song they played over and over again? I Fought the Law and the Law Won by the Clash. It must have worked. He surrendered.
the new 40
Like seasons, they each bring new perspectives and new challenges.
Therefore, when Logan heard that an ambulance was coming, his screaming quadrupled!
Gack.
Level two continues the factory setting, but adds some twists to it. Now Mario must contend with multiple fireballs as well as some sort of unidentifiable spring things. The weapons that DK uses are still man-made, but they are more mysterious than the simple barrel, suggesting a transition to a more animalistic form of attack. Additionally, in this level Mario gains extra points by recovering Pauline’s purse and parasol. Obviously, DK does not care for Pauline’s monetary possessions, which reinforces the suggestion of his intended rape. During these first two stages, Mario simply has to get near Pauline for the level to end; DK presumably seizes her and runs away, suggesting that the black male is not only lustful but also cowardly.
In unrelated news, I’ve been working on a small SHMUP-like video game for the past few weeks and I decided to throw together a quick demo video for it. I couldn’t find my Adobe Premiere CD, so I had an interesting time just trying to sync things up in Windows Movie Maker. Still, I had more luck with WMM than with Camtasia Studio (which I find terrible), so I can’t hate on it too much.
Green pepper diced - 1 /4 cup
Filigree Border die
Here goes…
However, there are times I wish that he is here, close to us, and having the bonds with his grandchildren. Well, I cannot have everything in life that goes the way I like them to be. C’est la vie!
We were thankful for the heated water.
Zoo in the Bois de Vincennes
What a great example.
Well, I just wanted to put some of my thoughts on this out there in front of you. At times I have felt silly for thinking such things but when it comes down to it, we all start out thinking that the piece of fiction or fantasy going through your head is a little ridiculous. But then it becomes a full-blown story that you are trying to push on Amazon or Smashwords. So why not a movie? Why shouldn’t Your Story be on the Big Screen?
Imagine having an online catalog of all of your books, curriculum, dvds... anything you want to categorize with the capability of loaning (even selling) these items to your friends or neighbors. You could view your friends' items and borrow from them as well. Need an item back? Send your friend a nice email reminder to return the item. This is what Lobster Network is all about.
Here are some pictures(taken by Abbas):
I grabbed a big handful of our Hain expenses leaflets and started handing them out. Incredibly I count the people waiting for info from me 3-4-5-6-7 wow! 10 minutes gone and I need more stock! Back to the counter passing by the abusers and anti free speech crowd smiling away to myself I cant help but notice their frustration is rising at our immediate success.
The agitation had centered around farmers opposing the release of water from the Panchna Dam located upstream of the Gambhir river, the primary source of water to the bird sanctuary. Political expediency ensured the gates of the Panchna Dam remained shut, and the bird sanctuary collared by the neck until it went almost entirely dry just as the summer rounded the bend.
Smart (1995)
For all the talk of “incubator companies” and corporate heart transplants and the like, I have not yet seen a cogent explanation, short of someone wanting to put tens of millions of pounds into the pot for creditors, as to how Rangers avoid liquidation.
But couldn't you have done it without leaving so much pain in your wake?
This continued until I was around 13.
in the second installment of my Back to School Series we are looking at hair. unlike nails which are an accent (meaning you can get away with not having them done) Hair can make or break your whole appearance. Thats not to say wake up 2 hours early to do your hair.. No, just give yourself enough time to do what you need to your hair such as curling, straightening, up do, half up do, braided etc so you are not left in stress mode rushing around like you are all types of loca. There are different types of styles to suit different types of people, so cater to the inner you. dont wake up thinking you can tackle a half braided half curled hairstyle on the morning of school, when you havent practised beforehand.. just dont, it wont work out well.. lol
Tony Shalhoub/Stanley Tucci (Big Night)
I love: my camera / pc more than any other material possession I own
I was busy before Christmas making this doll for my mum:
“Fiction is as much an art of omission as it is one of commission, and in “The Tiger’s Wife,” Obreht commits too much. She places stories in the foreground — of the deathless man, and of the tiger’s wife — that might have been better left in the background . . .”
I just received an e-mail asking for help from The Wharf Rat-Camden Yards. I'll give you an edited version:
But if God’s original plan is for us to be in fellowship with Him, and if God is all-powerful enough to bring down judgment on people – which he does not “want” to do because He loves His people – then certainly God is powerful enough to restrain evil in the world. So why doesn’t He? Why doesn’t God prevent bad things such as evil and disease and death from happening in the first place?
In groups we dissected, sliced and diced what consultants are and do and explored interesting avenues of differing situations and different requirements. The two hours was over in a flash and we all still had so many ideas to explore, new people to meet.
This is your future self. I would like to talk to you about time management…
illuminates
Readers are in with a sporting chance of having a Raphael Maklouf lurking in a pocket / handbag. It is the portrait of Mrs Battenberg Saxe Coburg Gotha where she only looks 30 years younger than her then current age, rather than the prior 50 or the current 20.
July 31 – Cincinnati, OH @ Riverbend Music Center
Hugo Matthysen Blankenberge B
Now, I did deviate from the pattern a bit. She calls for bean bag beads for stuffing. I really wanted this to be a comfy snugly piece so I used poly-fil. (My childhood memories of bean bags had me shying away!) It took a massive amount to make it as firm as I was hoping for. I think we ended up using a full 5-lb box of poly-fil plus some. Two 5-lb boxes was enough to stuff the Large and Small sizes. Quilt batting is also required. You'll be interfacing each "petal" by basting in a piece of batting at 3/8" from the raw edge. No doubt, the batting will help with smoothing over your fabric if you use beads to stuff. You then trim the batting close to your basting stitch so it's not in your seam allowances avoiding a lot of bulk in your seams. I also made a little change here too. I made a pattern piece that was identical to the petal but 1/4" smaller all the way around for the batting. That way, I skipped the trimming out part! (Always looking for shortcuts!)
Sometimes in my line of work, I witness horrible things; fathers saying final goodbyes to their toddlers, alcoholics realizing that liver failure is very real and oh, wait, oops, they really didn’t want to die, or regrettable things done in a psychotic break. Closing the door to the nurses’ station and making a fart joke is an invaluable gift. Because if we laugh, we don’t cry. And when we let it go and don’t cry, we go home and live our own lives. We do not fall prey to alcoholism, depression and burnout that plagues the caregiving professions. I’m just home from one of those laugh or cry days, and I am laughing. And having a small glass of Cabernet.
I’ve thought about what I would say to him the day we moved out. I thought I’d have a million words and topics i’d need to cover to make myself feel like I was heard. When it came down to it that wasn;t the case. We helped eachother pack up his things and communicated like a team of movers. Conversations without drama. It’s funny how when it comes down to the moment of truth not much really needs to be said. We both know. As he was leaving he asks “What do you want a hug or something?” I asked “if you’re saying that in a mean way, then no”. He told me he didn’t want to have any communication with me. Which I am totally fine with. My life is much better now that I’m single. I told him “I’m sorry it didn’t work out between us, but it just couldn’t we both had alot of growing up to do and we couldn’t do that together” We gave eachother a long hug. I can’t remember the last time he even hugged me. It was one of those hugs that meant something. We got a bit misty eyed and he left. After all this time, this is the first day that I’ve felt like this place is actually mine. Everything in this place belongs to me. I have no one but myself here and it feels good. All the thoughts of Darren are gone. As terrible as that entire relationship was I do not regret it. Of course I’m left here with more issues than I started with but I know myself so much more now. I know what I want, what I deserve and most of all what I expect our of a relationship. Love is great, passion is great. But when you’re not working together as a team and not inspiring eachother to be better people then it’s just destructive. I’ve learned so much from being with Darren. I’ve seen very dark sides of the world and of human nature. i guess maybe that’s why I’m so jaded. His punk rock mentality did rub off on me and I started to see only the negative in everything. I’m just starting to get back to me again. Rediscovering my hobbies and living the life of a single young woman downtown. I’m still damaged goods when it comes to letting any man into my life. The big difference between he and I is that after I end a relationship I always take time to myself. At least a year. He likes to jump into a new one. Exactly what he did with me when things ended with Mila. I guess I should have been smarter when starting something with him but i was just a kid. I didn’t know any better. I think the biggest lesson I learned from being with him is how to stick up for myself (when I finally did) I have a bad habit of people pleasing way too much and it drains me. Now I’m finally standing up for myself and what I believe in. Something I’ve never been able to do my entire life. So I guess what I’m saying is: At the end of the day all those words I thought I needed to say were better left unsaid. He both already knew. Healing takes time, relationships take work, and one of the greatest rewards in life is to find yourself again.
Setting it up is very time consuming.
"Pippa Piper picked Peck over Pickle or Pepper?" exclaimed Mary incredulously. "Which of the Peck pair did Pippa Piper pick?"
Weihenstephaner is a brewer of German origin and is situated on a hill called Nährberg in the south of the country at Freising in the region of Bavaria. Just north of Munich. Map 175, G6. The former monastery lays claim to the title of ‘oldest working brewery in the whole wide world ever’ and can trace its brewing origins back to 1040.
Then the band goes and places two equally worthy B-sides to boot. "The Finest thing" is a simple & much faster paced song about failing at confronting feelings of longing, while the song itself sound like Dinosaur Jr covering a C-86 band. That comparison is meant in the best way possible. "Out of Work and on the Dole" is almost a combination of the previous two songs, an equal parts love and apathy fulled anthem as galloping drum work pushes the song along. Easily the noisiest song of the bunch, the feedback from the guitar and noise in general of the song help to perfectly cement the tone of the song: the sense of being engulfed by life.
To be a leader is not too difficult. We can develop such qualities within us and can be a leader. We need to impliment ideas. We should walk on that path. Here meaning of a leader is given below. But the thing is that we are always influenced by others. We never use our mind. We are always ruled by others.
If you have an aphid infestation on a plant that’s too large for this method you can spray the tree with any number of insecticides – aphids are relatively easy to kill, but I don’t like to use any pesticides if I can possibly avoid them, and I’ve discovered a method that works well for me.
I was sorry when it ended – I wanted more of everything. From what I know about the other bands that will be appearing on upcoming dates, this will continue to be a can’t-miss ticket. I hope that Big Top Rock becomes a regular event – it is a worthy idea that deserves to live on.
That's all for today, thanks for visiting!!! :)
2.Cumin/Jeera : 1tsp
The deadline to enter is Thursday, December 23, 2010 at midnight central time.
We feel attracted to creative people who are likewise full of ideas that are benefitting Thailand and the world at large. The excitement that emerges from an idea brainstorm with likeminded people fills us with a lot of energy but the frenzy puffs out quickly if you don’t follow through. It’s the doers with the drive, commitment and energy that bring these ideas to life and two extraordinary doers are Boom and Alice founders of the social enterprise mysocialmotion.
-tim
I really do need to get this presentation finished up. It's supposed to be in the 60's today and I have a run date with my aunt this afternoon. I would like to not have to do anything this evening that has to do with school so I must get to work. Tomorrow marks the final night for this current class...and I will officially be HALFWAY DONE with my program!!!
And perhaps that’s the lesson I’ve learned from exploring the truths I subconsciously (or otherwise) put into my own pieces. They’re in there because that’s what I know. They make up some of the more fascinating aspects of my character development. Mara Mcbain wrote something about her version of character development that will definitely entertain anyone who follows the link behind that bold name.
Step 3: Cut/emboss using die cut machine, blade side up.
I got to be strong
"It's not like being on the dole,
So anyhow, post-divorce, I’m a little more vigilant about how people react to me, and vulnerability makes me Super-Glue-stuck-to-fingers crazy. Yet one way I’ve totally exposed myself in my 2.0 version – like stark-nudey-naked-bare-assed exposed – is through this blog.
The following day my new friend Peter came in and I’ve noted we had a great conversation for about 3 hours. Peter was so interesting and being a psychologist could really get into some deep conversations which I just loved. He told me once again to get out of Firestone. I was seriously considering it. On June 9th I must have been having a bad day as I recorded “didn’t get dressed or answer phone”, so things were still very much an emotional rollercoaster for me. Most of the time I could keep it together, functioned very well, but occasionally I’d have a really down day and wouldn’t fight it.
So, now you know that Average Hike the company will be offering, the Variable pay that will be given to the employees.
Jackie and Minutes Matter Studio are offering a demonstration JVT Studio, a graphic design program that translates the fabulous draperies and valances from Jackies book, The Design Directory of Window Treatmentsinto elevation renderings filled with fabrics, colors, and textures.
And then there's the park. Emily loves being outside and going to the park. She's perfectly happy if I just let her wander around the big, open field and explore. But she loves going down the slide, too. The bigger the slide, the better.
When to use: Whenever a seldom seen person is mentioned during a telecast, particularly if his name is Trev Alberts. Which’ll never happen, since he’s dead to ESPN. Dead.
"That," said the doctor, smiling shyly at the two students, "that is my very latest attempt at a perfect precipitation of colloidal platinum in the sub-microscopic sized particles. You can't see very much because the light is reflected by the tiny particles in so many millions of ways that nothing but a vague impression of grey existence gets to your retina. As a matter of fact, most of these particles are of dimensions smaller than the wavelength of ordinary visible light, and so it takes a small group of them to reflect even one wave of light. Naturally, they diffuse it greatly since the colloidal nature of the material makes the deposit far from even or solid in surface nature. You will remember that molecules are invisible to the eye, even aided by the microscopes of highest power. Were we to start grinding a material from small chunks down to fine particles, even though we trace the pieces through a microscope, we will sometime have reached, were it possible to grind that fine, the molecular sized particles. Now, limiting ourselves to to a single molecule, we would have ground a material from quite visible lumps clear down through the colloidal sized aggregations, and finally we would have ground it into invisibility. Truly, that would be most odd, yet it is theoretically possible, as you can see."
VOTE TUSC AT THE ELECTION AND COME TO THE YOUTH FIGHT FOR JOBS DEMO ON WEDNESDAY
These are some of the fun tiles I made. I realized a little late that you could personalize them with messages, names, etc.
Sameer went white with fear and without a second glance, dashed out of the house, breathing only when he reached home. His head was spinning and sweat was running down his forehead. He was shaken completely by what he had seen.
I plan to take all the kids up to see her on Sunday and bring her some gifts. I hope that will raise her spirits some and I hope she's got to eat by then as well. Overall I would say she's doing well on adjusting, I just wish things could go back to what they used to be. I know it can't/won't happen but I can pray.
extra years,
After leaving the coffee shop, Brenda and Natalie decide to test out another urban legend, the one about Bloody Mary. Sure, why not...I mean, it's not like there haven't already been 14,000 Bloody Mary movies since this came out, right? (including the 3rd movie in this very franchise) They stand in front of the boarded-up door to Stanley Hall and say "Bloody Mary" 5 times. They hear a faint shout or scream. As they lean closer to listen for any ghosts, Damon(played by Joshua Jackson) pops up behind the girls to frighten them.
"I know! I wonder if my dad should call someone about that...."
Hubby is here for most of two weeks, to help little B and I settle into the new place and establish a routine. After he leaves, it’ll be just the two of us for the rest of the summer (with the exception of one or two more short visits). I’m really excited about this job (internship, really), and I’m looking forward to getting to know a new city, but I’m anxious for four months of taking on all the parenting responsibilities myself.
For my personal sustainability promise, I have decided to use only mugs and reusable water bottles rather than throwing away paper cup after paper cup. After calculating how many coffee drinks I have during the day, I decided it would be a great idea to invest my money is a thermos and plastic water cup. I am a huge coffee drinker and after realizing that on average, I buy about 3 cups during the weekdays and about 1 or 2 on weekends, which is about19 cups a week and roughly 76 drinks a month. So in one year I consume right around 912 drinks per year. That is 912 cups per year. Now multiply that times the coffee drinking population in America who consumes around the same amount as I do every year. Do you know what that number is? 105 million people fall into the number of people who like me, drink about three cups a day. A whopping 957,600,000 cups of coffee are drank a year. Granted, not all of these cups are the plastic to go ones but a good majority of the cups are. For a long time the only place those cups would go is in a garbage can which fill our landfills and decompose.
Mystery In Space (DC/Vertigo) This here is an $8, -page one-shot anthology borrowing the name of and old DC sci-fi comic to use as an organizing principal for the contributors' submissions. The quality varies from inspired to tedious, but each of the short stories is fairly well constructed around a stinger of an ending, and any comic boasting artwork from Michael Kaluta, Kyle Baker, Mike Allred and Ming Doyle is pretty much the definition of "worth a look."
New York-based Human Rights Watch said the court’s closed-door trial was ‘a farce’ that took Hun Sen’s campaign of ‘persecution of critics to a new extreme and highlights government control over the judiciary’.
barracks...grrrrr. On my way home from a funeral on Tuesday there was a sound in the pedal area that should not have been there. The Senior Cat and I oiled the strategic spot and I took it off for a careful pedal up our little street and back again. CRUNCH! Oh.
Drop by my website, http://www.kjtradingsystems.com, and you can see how I trade. While you are there, sign up for my free newsletter and view my complimentary trading videos.
But even if the Preds fall in game 3, I have newfound respect for the organization of the Nashville Predators. Most team would let their players off with a warning and let them play, but Nashville has decided to take the path less traveled and go against the grain.
As you can see, it's perfectly fine to be a different sort of collector with different collections - maybe in another year or two I can re-write this post with an overarching collector classification. Until then, why don't you chime in with what type of collector you are - perhaps I missed a type of collector?
Wipe out skillet with paper towels, and heat remaining 2 tablespoons oil until shimmering. Add garlic and cook until fragrant, about 30 seconds. Remove from heat and let cool slightly. Whisk cooled garlic oil and parsley into reserved yogurt mixture until combined. Season with salt and pepper to taste. Serve chicken with yogurt sauce.
I've been trying to make some small projects to help me understand some of the knitting terms and stitches again. The Crofter's Cowl in the picture above helped me figure out some lace knitting and reading a chart. I'm working my way up to knitting a sweater and I can't wait to jump into that project!
Mayall and Edmondson play Richie and Eddie, proprietors of possibly the worst hotel in the world, a scenario that lends itself well to the kind of chaos that has been their fertile ground for the best part of their careers.
The river sweats
Physician’s Formula Multi-Colored Blush in Blushing Berry
There's the front and back of the mini cushion! Apart from being made of the most gorgeous fabric it has tiny little beads sewn into each flower and a star and imagine charm.I love the ship on the front...it's now been named The Dawn Treader ^_^ Does it remind anyone else of The Dawn Treader? Anyhoo...and I love the fish (or dolphin) on the back.
"Huh? Wha?" I sputtered, quickly rising to my feet.
It is also known that certain genetic factors increase the harmful effects of lead poisoning in susceptible children; however, these factors are not completely understood as of 2003.
On Monday morning, Tommy, having been knocked out by Joe, must read Vanzetti's letter before the entire university. Will Michael be expelled from the university and will Tommy lose his job and his wife?
Another trend that has cropped up in more recent times is to take a deeper look into the character of Maid Marian, often with the author focusing on her more than Robin. The first book I ever read that did this was Maid Marian by Elsa Watson. This was one of those books I stumbled upon at the library and decided to take a chance on. While it was certainly nothing groundbreaking, it was enjoyable and stayed true to many of the classic elements of the Robin Hood legend. The story was told from the perspective of Marian, who was not simply a passive damsel in distress. Even though she went to Robin for help, she was still a woman of action.
Of course someone came in. A mystery woman came barreling into the bathroom and into a stall three doors down. Obviously I needed to wait her out, lest we make eye contact at the sinks and she get the impression that I was the cause of the smell (the horror!). So there we sat.
Shall be a loved, and happy wife."
He meets Assef, a terrible bully, and his two cronies down an alleyway. Assef beats Hassan and rapes him, all while Amir watches from a distance, too afraid to intervene. But more than that, Hassan is beaten because he won’t give up the last flag he caught, he knows how important it is to Amir (for Amir, that flag represents his father’s love, something he feels in constant competition with Hassan for). So, afraid to lose the kite, Amir lets Assef hurt Hassan and lives with that for the rest of his life.
For comment, contact Aunty Jane at 0784031302
4. Remove Batteries From Seldom-Used Devices
This Contract should be binding and presented to a Senior Judge who will also confirm this is Legal and Binding and up to both parties to ensure it works otherwise it is enforceable on each Parent.
How I heard you flap and rustle, cloth defiant!)
This will take you to a blog called The Great Leveller and talks about how to make a fix that allows people that currently can't, to comment on your blog. A lot of us find if the comment box is at the foot of your post, that 'embed' prevents commenting...but where the blog provides a new page with comments and comment box, all is possible! So if you wanna get a few more comments, this may well be worth the two minutes and two tabs it takes. It is a temporary fix....Blogger itself has to come up with a permanent
***If you are participating in the 52 Layouts Challenge, please use the link below to link your layout to this post. You have until Friday at 11:59PM PST to post your week 45 layout. The link will allow you to post a title and thumbnail that link to your site, where we can see the layout in all its glory!
Amidst all this, we who love freedom speak of a vulpine "political class," no member of which can be trusted. We orate that it must somehow be removed from the levers of power, so that persons who genuinely love freedom and appreciate the importance of objective law can get to work at restoring those blessings. More openly than ever, sincere Americans, men of good will, mutter about the probable necessity of a Second American Revolution, aimed at deposing the current ruling class and restoring the Constitution in full and literal effect.
Your words meaning little, the water level’s high
With his steady editing, Bresson establishes what is an odd series of events as logical, though the punctuative effect of the cutting gives each new twist an even more severe impact. In the absence of music, the editing takes on the effect of its own fright cues, its jumps occasionally startling for their jarring of still frames and still action. To maintain a lack of blunt action, Bresson elides over what would be the centerpieces of other films: locked in solitary confinement, Yvon receives Valium each day to calm him. But when the guards leave, the camera stays behind to show Yvon spitting out his dose and adding the pills to a collection he's hidden. The next shot is from his old cell where his bunkmates watch out bars to see an unconscious Yvon loaded into an ambulance.
When I went to see Dr. Kaldenbaugh about a medical problem in 2011, I asked him about Ferne. He told me that coming out to the waiting room to tell friends about Ferne was the hardest thing he ever did in his entire career as a doctor in the Verde Valley. As he told me this, he had tears in his eyes.
And here is the Montecristo Maravilla, a limited edition issued in 2005 for the fifth release of the Habanos Collection "Book" series and the 70th anniversary of the Montecristo Brand, an amazing double-robusto size 55 ring gage for 182 mm.
For me, it's like a blast from the past. I grew up with 'salvage'. It was just a normal everyday part of my life. My father scoured the countryside, filled up a big barn like structure that he attached to OUR HOUSE, and sold it for a second income. He already worked as a painter in the paper mill.
Well done Jade! Love your work.
“It should no longer be tolerated.”
2 tsp. fresh parsley, minced
An open heart lives authentically and genuinely with love, humbleness and gratitude.
In what has to be a slap in the face to 200,000 people all over the world who hoped to come to Canada as Skilled Workers, Jason Kenney and the Harper Government have with one swipe of the pen, eliminated the Skilled Worker backlog of immigration applicants.
A very hard day today. Flip was fine when I fed him lunch and took him for a walk around the floor, but he awakened from a nap a totally different person, angry, aggressive, frustrated and not his sweet-tempered self at all. He was throwing punches at everyone, making fists, baring his teeth and hissing like a small child who is pretending to be a scary monster. Several people were in fact scared, and the woman who was scheduled to be his evening sitter refused because she said he spat at her. (I think he must have hissed and perhaps some saliva escaped, but I didn't see it.) Security was called (again.) He remembered the words "Fuck you!" and hurled them at everyone. I think he has reached the end of his endurance for the hospital, which is like prison in his case as everyone is pushing and pulling him and controlling everything he does. Another dimension to his pain derives from being relatively young and used to exercising his body. In his mind, I think, he is fighting for his life, Flip against the world. He even yanked my arm off his, even though I had just helped him in the bathroom by aiming his penis (inexpertly) at the toilet. His life has lost much of its dignity.
We've promised each other through scribbled notes that we'll always stay in each other’s soul.
Someone grabbed my shoulders from behind and yanked me back before I could wrap my mind around the meaning behind Eli’s words. In a blink, I found myself behind someone tall. Someone really tall. And quite broad. And very male.
I commit myself to never giving up on myself as I walk this process of self-forgiveness, along this Journey to Life, as I see and realize that this world is not as it can and must be in order that suffering and abuse may someday end, and in seeing the suffering of the animals and in realizing how the children of this world suffer in silence til they become living examples of us and so the cycles of suffering, abuse and death continue, and I see, realize and understand that I am equally responsible to assist life as it currently exists so that Life in it’s truest form may emerge here within and as our physical reality as all as one as Equal.
Here’s the set-up:
Heres some great images I've found looking through...must do this with another top artist Ian Knox sometime..
When it was time to have the clothes photographed we felt very lucky to have Banbury Cross model for us, and 1 of our favourite photographers to shoot it- Tony Nylons. We were really thrilled with the results as they were just how we imagined when we embarked on the collection.
- pinch of sea salt (or kosher salt) for each truffle
Back in January, Dalia Lithwick of Slate raised alarm over the law, which makes recording someone without their consent a felony punishable by up to 15 years in prison.
Dinner tonight was really good too, I always love coming home because then my dad grills for us! tonight he made bbq chicken and I was in charge of making the asparagus and I made some kale chips for myself. I love veggies!!!
Of those moves, 2 were dorms in college, and 6 were moves to different houses in the same town. So those weren't so hard. But it sounds more dramatic to say I've moved 12 times. But I have seriously lived in 6 different towns in 3 different states in 2 different time zones. For a girl who likes putting down some roots, that's tough.
birthday is on Christmas, too so it is double the fun!) I loved making my list, telling Santa what I wanted and then the anticipation of waiting to open presents and see if I got what I wanted.
Sounds simple, but in the heat of the trading day it can be a challenge for many. Make sure you are always resetting to zero after each trade, win or lose.
I was invited to run a workshop on HE at a conference in Leeds about informal education which took place in May 2009. I asked Denise if she would come along with me, as I was nervous about going alone, and I knew that it would be much more fun with her as my side kick! We got to sit in on some very interesting talks in the morning, but chatting to another delegate at lunch time was a far more interesting affair! To be honest what we heard threw us both a bit, Denise more so I think, given her hope that Badman was a fair and reasonable man, and that these would be qualities that would show through in his report. To cut a long story short, what we heard was the most contentious aspects of the contents of the Badman Report, which wasn’t due out for another few weeks. The delegate in question had been at a conference at which Badman had presented his report - at a time when the HE *community* was still very much hoping to be able to influence the outcome. It was pretty explosive stuff, and the delegate obviously realised that she had let the cat out of the bag (she seemed to have been under the impression that the report had already been released) and very quickly stopped talking to us, leaving Denise and I somewhat shell shocked. We both decided that the best option would be to assume the other delegate had been mistaken, but to check out the conference details when we got back home.
Tyrion is by far the most fascinating character in the series to me. (As a side note, I am so glad that Peter Dinklage won the Emmy for his portrayal of Tyrion. It was well deserved.) Tyrion is a member of the Lannister family which should automatically place him in the antagonist category, yet it doesn’t. In spite of the way he has been neglected and humiliated by his family because of his dwarfism he is still loyal to them and works to help them. It is so interesting to see how, while he has still learned how to use his vast intellect to manipulate, he has been spared from the lessons of cruelty and selfish indifference towards others that his siblings learned. In their disgust for him and the resultant neglect his family inadvertently helps Tyrion to become the most moral of the group. He uses a lot of the sneaky and often underhanded tricks of his family to achieve his goals, yet most often those goals are for the benefit and protection of others. Thanks to Tyrion I am always torn between wanting the Lannisters defeated and wanting Tyrion to succeed. I could write an entire blog on his character alone and I can not wait to see what Martin does with him in the next book.
Stand up and lead. More people are counting on you than you can possibly imagine.
Can’t be bothered with exercise.
Post marriage Genelia Dsouza , now Mrs Genelia Deshmukh appeared with hubby Ritiesh Deshmukh in a white anarkali shalwar suit with embroidery work and looked pretty as ever. For gorgeous Ms Bachchan it was a simple Sabyasachi suit.
The in-laws have been visiting for a few days. It's been pleasant. They're good people.
In our past experience, a coronal mass ejection (CME) precipitates a flurry of electromagnetic activity on earth, including increased crop circle appearances.
If you do all that right, whoever reads your email is inclined to like you. Now comes the make or break point of the process–present the book. If your book blurb is boring, it won’t matter that the reviewers like you. They won’t read your novel. Ever.
My Father, who has given them to me, is greater than all, and no one can take them out of the Father’s hand.
We still plan to do that, but now that I’m in full blown packing mode, the time for purging is over. I recognize that I don’t need or want 9 different spatulas, but I don’t have to time to study every spatula, postulate on the merits of each one, and pick the best two or three. There all getting dumped in box, and I can decide which ones I want to keep after we move. The rest will stay in the box, and they will go off to Goodwill.
Hypnotized
For the next hour I tried to get rid of Bob, but the drink had reduced his short-term memory to four seconds and he seemed to be operating on a loop, reintroducing himself to me every few minutes. In the end, I gave up and said I was going home.
This MOC is truly something special. Not only are the details extremely beautiful, but also the photgraphy is mind blowing. The MOC is about the town of Ferentium which lies between Dalmanutha and Loreos-Ultra. Much of it’s prosperity is owed to these two great cities.
Well I've completely redeemed myself from yesterday...I made goal today! Todays task was harder & longer than yesterday with a lower inversion ceiling, and I still managed 3rd place woman and 14th out of 83! And if anyone doesn't believe me, it's all documented on TV.
On Monday, the EU announced an additional Euro 100 million towards the costs of the new sarcophagus, Japan a regular donor has its own Fukushima problems, and several other nations who regularly donate have painful economic issues and IMF involvement. Many other nations will stand by their promises towards Chernobyl and given the current geopolitical struggle between the EU and Russia over trade agreements with Ukraine, as expected Russia pledged money to counter the EU donations financially despite not being a long term donor previously.
Then, it came to a time when we had to say goodbye to each other. I don’t like goodbyes but I went to the train station with them. Our ‘brief encounter’ moment came when they had to check in at last. Their train was already waiting on the platform. We hugged and kissed and shook hands several times. They put their tickets into the machine and the barriers opened and shut like silver-encrusted blades. The tide of feeling sadness and happiness seemed to rise over me. In my sober posture, I waved at my friends and blew kisses with an aching heart.
Gill - Dosie Rosie
A few moments later, his reply:
"Burrows lives in Wisconsin. Only six to seven hours in the car." Abby limped into the kitchen area. The washer swished quietly in the corner. She was a fast healer, but she'd be feeling the wound on her ankle for days. She tried not to wince as she balanced and attempted to make herself a sandwich.
Like the Limnanthes, I started the Bishop's Lace in the greenhouse. I soon found that it was susceptible to overwatering, and ended up with only 3 plants from a six-pack. Fair warning, if you are going to grow it! Bishop's Lace is readily available at most places that stock Renee's Seeds or Botanical Interests.
Roses are Red…Bobby Vinton
are among the worst in almost all
Used as....
I do not want you to work through your stuff with me. Round about transition, “Are you really sure you are doing the right thing?” was a bearable question, but not if repeated. Take yes for an answer. Yes, I have thought about this. For years. Yes, I know all sorts of ways in which it could go wrong. I have considered all the options, and this is the one I choose. And I choose how to work it out for myself- offers of a listening ear are welcome, but I have to choose when and whether to take that offer up.
Tip #2: Income tax management is an important ingredient When 401ks were introduced 30-plus years ago, the drumbeat was about the beauty of tax deferral. The theory was: Defer paying taxes until employees are in a lower tax bracket in retirement.
Boiled peanuts are pretty straightforward to make. If you can, it is best to get the peanuts straight from the farm. For an authentic, although time-consuming, experience, you may even get the vine (peanuts are legumes and grow underground on the root of a viney, low growing bush) and pick them off while sitting under a shade tree and drinking sweet tea. If that is not an option, grocery stores usually have them when in season in the summertime. After washing the peanuts, place them in a large pot and cover with water. Salt liberally (this is key – don’t try to be healthy and go light on the salt). Boil for a few hours, until the meat of the peanut becomes soft, and enjoy!
Saul went on to note that rationality is only one type of reason and devoted a book, Equilibrium, to discussing the other types.
Although it is not my favourite, I do buy Sally Hansen nail polish at CVS because all those fun colours tempt me so. At under $3 a bottle, it's no huge loss if one is shitty. And Sally Hansen nail polishes can be hit or miss -- they have mostly been hits for me, but when they miss, THEY MISS. "Mellow Yellow" by Sally Hansen has got to be the worst nail polish I have ever owned. It is goopy and never goes on opaque -- no matter what I do it always has streaks and bare spots in it. It's just an all-round mess for me. Maybe I have a defective bottle -- I don't know -- but it just does not go on right or ever look good. It always looks like a 3 year old painted my nails! Now as I said -- most Sally Hansen nail polishes have been good. I really like Blue Me Away and Celeb City! Just this particular colour "Mellow Yellow" is awful.
The new concept design will be based on the idea to add one ring, made by the same material of the sphere, at the border of the Upper Hemisphere. The Ring, that will have all the functions of the Ribs, must be designed in order to fit perfectly inside the hemisphere avoiding all eyebolts and screws.
Easing slowly into this was the key. Coat the back of a spoon, smell it. Yup, smells great!
I think you shouldn't leave Tate without trying their cocktails. Karl tells me that they have been making a few new additions to the menu. However, earlier on I saw Karl getting his blow torch out to make a cocktail and I told him "I want that one cos it looks cool" LOL. It turned out to be a lemon meringue martini (RM34), which is very fun to drink IMHO. I also tried the Pina Agave which was pretty nice and refreshing, thanks to the agave nectar and cucumber content.
I am not one to make too many comments on any event after the fact. In great part because I want to enjoy what I am watching. I do not want to over analyze what took place, or what will be taking place in the future as a result. Yet, today I can not stop thinking about the Extreme Rules event last night. So much so, that I took to the internet this afternoon to check out what my fellow fans had to say about said event. Needless to say, we have a difference of opinions on a few things. My opinion of last night’s event in fact, could not be more different from some of the blogs and articles I have spent my time reading today. The differences are so great I find the need to comment on them, and Extreme Rules in some way. I decided the best outlet would be via my blog, because after all, blogs were made for strong opinions and commentaries.
This experience that will change my life
My kitchen faces south, and is SUPER bright. (Not that I’m complaining.) The problem with all of the light is that it is like a spotlight on all of the imperfections in my cabinet paint job! Ugh. As soon as I hung the first door, it was clear that they were going to need another coat.
What we did not know, was the ashes were not totally cold. The embers ignited in the paper sack and the whole kitchen and living room filled with smoke. There were Chinese people screaming everywhere and all we wanted to do was get our money and get the hell out of there.
That was it. From that moment on I kept trying to make up for the “escape to chinatown” and change my unhappy destiny. It was college or bust.
We used to play there about once a month. Before we moved out of the
My first line in the play is spoken to a timid new member of the gut girls on her first day in the sheds; but I almost feel as if I'm saying it to myself, willing my nerves back under control, telling myself I'll be ok. And it works; suddenly I've switched into character, the lines are coming at the right times, I've remembered what I'm supposed to do.
What's New Pussy Cat
Over the past few weeks, I've spent my time finding ways to avoid stuffing my hindquarters into a chair and writing. I'm approaching the end of a first draft for a novel project. This always seems to happen when I'm approaching the end of a writing project. My last few chapters seem to take me forever to finish.
The sauce was a bit reddish and tomatoey, with a vinegar twinge. Not too much of either though, and I like the sauce.
When Summer went into labor, her mother, Ida Mae, kept referring to the gift of being Ricky’s widow. And what his gift would mean to Summer’s future. “Momma, you have a one-track mind. Money, money, money. God help me. Stop talking and help me” Summer screamed as she was about to have her first child. Ida wasn’t one to teach anyone anything. She didn‘t feel Summer needed any help. “I can’t help you, I’m just here for moral support. Women do this everyday. I did it seventeen times with no help from nobody.” Ida proclaimed as she rang out a wash rag to wipe Summer’s forehead. “Momma please!” Summer begged. Ida began coaching Summer on how to breathe and telling her when to push. Ziggy Elwood Hayes was born to Summer Kay exactly thirty-three weeks after Ricky died.
It's pretty, right?
O is for Opinions. Not specifically anybody's opinion, just opinions in general.
A boyfriend’s mom made this as a side dish to accompany dinner often – and I would fight to the death to have the last of it. I have watched her make it dozens of times but never paid attention to how it happens. I was determined to make it work for me and it was a success!! It’s seriously the easiest recipe ever, with just four main ingredients:
A.) Hawaiin/Polynesian
The Philippines is now claiming the area after having proven that it is indeed part and, in fact, an extension of the country’s eastern continental shelf.
And, crackling into the air, leave me half-blind.
At that time, Nokia was the top smartphone vendor with market share of 23.8 percent. A year later, it holds a staggeringly lower 8.2 percent stake in the smartphone market. Apple was also still ahead of Samsung at the time, but the smartphone landscape has changed significantly in the past twelve months.
Clemens, it appeared, insisted on attending Congress to get his message across. He sat before the Committee and denied any illegal use of drugs. McNamee was castigated as a liar and a cheat. Clemens appeared at first to have made his point.
- seeing the Tower Bridge and singing ‘London Bridge is falling down’ while crossing it (Nicky)
passing and you wanted one; you saw a train and you wanted one too. Many of
I didn't know I was in trouble, but things were starting to get worse, not better. The swelling that I experienced at the end of my pregnancy was starting to get more pronounced and more painful. It was hurting me to walk. The look of my legs was thick from thigh to ankle, hardly tapering at the knee. The ankle was so swollen, they were puffy and sore. The tops of my feet would hurt just to tap to the touch. My face had swollen, my hands and arms and my whole body more or less.
Enhanced eBooks are on everyone’s lips, yet there is no general consensus on what an ebook has to have to be considered an “enhanced” ebook. Some conversion services consider a linked Table of Contents to be an enhanced service, others take the term to mean embedded audio and video files, while then there are those like myself who think that an enhanced ebook is internal hyperlinks within the ebook to a different section – a footnotes section or another part of the ebook that offers an explanation – and external hyperlinks. (In the interest of full disclosure, I have to admit that probably 90% if the ebooks that I build could be considered enhanced.)
Who do you think you are? How do you know? Who do you want to be? Post your thoughts on the matter and share with me your stories of “finding yourself” along the road.
22. Household Dust: A Harmless Natural Occurrence Only Women Notice
‘Psst! Do you want to go to a secret cinema?’
Anyways... i'm quite busy today as i've not got another night off now will christmas day! so i've got to get my skates on this morning!
In the way that we must go
The sheep that are My own hear and are listening to My voice; and I know them, and they follow Me.
At the Calgary Freemason’s breakfast, an all-time Albertan told me of the time when he passed through a town north of Calgary. He missed by 5 minutes, of seeing the country western star singer,
you may be any of the above. or if you feel as though you are something else, do tell me! I'm open to them all.
Gdansk. This was my favorite from this trip and where I spent the most time. It used to be a free city, doing its own thing, not really being much of this or that, until one day it was invaded by Nazis who shelled its port, murdered a bunch of post office employees, and then tried to make it look like self defense (? this was long before post office employees were known to snap into murderous rages) and that was how World War II started (more or less)! History lesson of the day.
Ponder: Reeaaacch around.
My mother grew up on the shores of Bear Lake which straddles the border of Utah and Idaho. This was an pleasant rural setting where the small local population struggled through a short growing season the sustain their lives. The settlement was not very old when my mother lived there as a girl, and everyone knew each other. Among the gathering places frequented by the locals was Jesse Cotter's General Store. Mother described the large cast-iron stove in the middle of the store which was the the only thing that could tear a child away from browsing the nooks and crannies of the store. Loitering in the store in the winter around the stove was a common thing to do.
Scattered. It is the only way to describe my brain of late. I have quite the obessional mind and I would like to start using this for good instead of teenage crushes and buying into someone elses created world. If I am not obsessing over our impending holiday of AWESOME, then it is about the dog that I want. Sometimes I even spend hours looking for exactly the right name for my yet unborn puppy.
Alright. I’ve described the stone-skipping process rather simply. The actual situation can be more complex and I don’t want to get into all that. If you’re interested I’ll add these references, you can follow up and read them (and I highly encourage you to!).
A DAY OFF!!! But that’s not what the plan says! How will I reach my goal if I take a day off?
The red one with the black skulls doesn’t work any longer, but I’m afraid to throw it away. I don’t remember what’s on it.
Baby Buns & Bunz Kidz - Girls
O’REILLY FW, STEVENS AB. Sickness absence due to influenza. Occup Med 2002; 52: 265-269.
Deep down inside, I know that what he did was wrong
My printer ink came in and it was only $13 for black and color refills via Amazon. I have not had ink in 3 months!
Philippians 4:6-7 (NLT)
“North Korea may consider abandoning (the test) if the United States agrees to a peace treaty,” the source said, reiterating a long-standing demand by Pyongyang for recognition by Washington and a treaty to end the 1950-1953 Korean War, which ended in a truce.
3 T butter
Finally we had the world premiere of Isaac Florentine's new direct-to-dvd movie Undisputed III. Florentine and one co-star Marko Zaror were on hand and it was a great, lively crowd. They cheered whenever Scott Adkins or Zaror would do some insane move, which is pretty often, and it made the film fun. If you have seen Undisputed II, you know what to expect here. It's wet punchy fun in a prison fighting movie kind of way.
He just wanted to win the election so he could say he made history, by being the first black president. When the work began to show up at his office, he started taking vacations so he could escape the responsibilities a President must face to be successful. He left the jobs to incompetent hacks who have no idea what it takes to run a paper route, much less a nation.
Atheist: That one is not funny!
In 1996, I moved to the States for grad school; specifically, Durham, NC, where I did a Ph.D. at Duke. School may have been the lure, but I quickly discovered that North Carolina was the most beautiful place I’d ever been. I lived there until 2002, then spent 2003 teaching at the University of South Carolina in Columbia. By the time I moved to Seattle in 2003, I had developed a fascination with the Carolinas that will never go away.
No amount is too small.
Finally, I was not sure if I got mad about my situation, I have already been able to yell with my real voice, it was full of rage when I screamed “AAAAHHHHH!”, then I got the chance to get up for seconds, and laid back again. Even though I was relieved and I sighed heavily, I stared in my ceiling for a long time, one of my cousins was there and asked me why I yelled. I said I had an ugly dream, f*ck. It was my first time to scream my whole life out. I was scared I have to admit, it was life and death for me. I find this dream more horrible now compared to my previous nightmares I have had since I was a child, like I felt my soul had partially lifted out from my body. It still gives me goosebumps while I am trying to reminisce it now.
He moved across the room and for a heart-stopping moment Sam thought he would hug her, but instead he held out his hand. She took it. It felt warm and soft.
Joanne
Then he proclaimed that God governs.
27) New England Patriots: LB Shea McClellin
I hope to be able to post more, but that will probably be when I have internet at home (Sometime after August 1st)
I am as curious as a child now than ever to see what happens when each new warp is wound and each new weft is inserted.
when the population increased so rapidly
* A mother is not a person to lean on, but a person to make leaning unnecessary.Dorothy Canfield Fisher
Here's a video that will really amaze you. I bet you have never seen THIS in your entire life. This has to be the most patient, loving cat on earth.
“Charlie;” I say.
I am in a completely different situation.
Good morning everybody (which is, right now, nobody).
-Restaurant discount
Sun And Steel (MCA)
My clothes are starting to get a little tight- the dress in this picture barely had room for me to breathe. Maternity clothes are not all that flattering and I'm trying to find things with elastic waists or flowing tops so I don't have to venture into the maternity department.
the heresy of your words
:: Last week's gorgeous weather was such a tease. It has been raining since Monday pretty much. Our backyard is a freaking lake. And there are giant worms and slugs coming out of who knows where and completely disgusting me. Of course Ryann is bouncing up and down, "Ohhhh WORM. Shh-lug. I want to see! I want to see!" Eeew eeew eeew. I HATE bugs of any kind. Except maybe butterflies.
It’s been reported that becoming disabled is like walking into a wall. You’ve been healthy your entire life, except for a few sprains, cuts and bruises. You never realized how your good health had added to your sense of well-being. You also never stopped to appreciate the value of a steady paycheck. But now, it has all ended.
Jack: But we all said them to each other on the bus. No one got mad.
When asked about who should replace Fabio Capello when he stands down after Euro 2012, Carragher stressed that the new boss should be English, and that having a foreign coach is a form of ‘cheating.’
Incredibly, the RGGI has managed to avoid public scrutiny of its operations by incorporating as a non-profit organization and leaving enforcement and regulation to the individual states. The corporation claims it does not have to respond to public requests for information since, technically, it is not actually a government entity.
86-00 Killed in the flooding of the Mediterranean
For those of you who have followed my planning and preparation, I thank you. I also thanks you for your words of encouragement and also, to those who have sponsored me; I hope you don’t want your money back.
Now I am not sure why I was worried about this event being very formal with my family involved in it, we are not renowned for being the most sensible family :-) Above is a photo of middle Sweetpea and Great Grandad Sweetpea with my Sister's tash bag, this went round the room for everyone to have photos taken with it. There was also a pair of plastic glasses with a willy nose doing the rounds too - goodness knows who bought that with them but the photos are very funny indeed :-)
Jeroen van Niele: Bass
The podcast was recorded at Levitz’s comedy club back on January 21 but audio of the episode had not been heard until this week.
Ahmanson Theater
Thursday- Problem Solving- Write your first name and last name. How many letters in each? How many letters all together? Which one has the most letters? Which one has the least letters? Click here for the label.
I used to stay on top of keeping things clean, but I’ve somehow let the mess get out of control, and now I don’t know how to keep up. It’s rather frustrating when you spend hours cleaning only to find your house in the exact same condition a few hours later. Moms, how do you cope? How do you keep up? I can certainly tell you that a clean house and car does wonders for my emotional well-being. Just imagine my angst to see a grilled cheese fall out of my car.
The man, Jonny, is talking about getting revenge for what happened back in the Civil War but the woman, Em, doesn't want him to go through with it. The object of the revenge? Well, he's sitting across the street in a saloon, enjoying lunch...
Your Blog Can Provide Therapy to You and Your Readers
He is also quadriplegic, has no swallow reflex and is also unable to cough.
Now go fetch some empty jars…
But this was always about the journey, rather than the destination. And it was a challenging, magical trip. Fortune smiled on us all the way. And a lot of very kind people gave us help, advice and encouragement.
All I know is this chick is very messy!
With the evolutionary concept, no obvious changes have been made with the cars layout. The retains a steeply raked attitude, Newey mentioned at the launch that the loss of EBDs will affect their ability to angle the car into the nose down attitude. But the evidence of the car on-track suggests that obtaining laptime with a lot of rake is not an issue.
GOOD COP or BAD COP?---Shit cop!
I KNOW! Sob for me... It's a terrible tragedy!
The weather is on the turn now so I will move into the green house and pot on chilli and peppers.
More importantly, the development of a registry should be a “service” that USATF provides (and coaches shouldn’t be charged, we don’t charge athletes for their drug tests) not to identify “drug” coaches, but to protect the youth that the sport serves. Because USATF is not only responsible for our “elite” athletes but oversees all of our youth programs. And to discover that we have been allowing coaches to work with our kids WITHOUT having done background checks on them is the height of irresponsibility on the part of USATF and appalling. If we are more concerned with whether or not a coach might embarrass the US by coaching an athlete that comes up “positive” than we are about putting our kids in the hands of potential pedophiles, drug pushers or individuals with other unsavory backgrounds, then the priorities of our leadership is in serious question!
Glass-House Stone Throwing
So not only do I get to announce a winner, I get to tell you about another great book to add to your list of perfect books for the holiday season. Congratulations Anna on winning and most importantly on your book!!
Happy Mothers Day beautiful Moms!
Biblical understanding is then only possible through the work of the Holy Spirit. The apostle put it this way in Romans 8:5-6.
Competing and Complementary Books. Make a list of books that compete with yours and those that complement it. Give a sentence or two about your reasoning.
Everyday is Like Sunday – Morrissey
The only thing that disappointed me was the ending. I really wanted Shannon to kill Brandy, not give her a new start. I mean, it was a nice thing to do, but it seemed inconsistent with her character. She was angry and spiteful and lonely, and saving Brandy’s life by giving her an identity she’s always wanted is just too big of a stretch for me. I guess it kind of furthers the idea of her being invisible though because now she isn’t even technically a person anymore since she abandoned her identity. I was also a little confused at how Brandy and Evie had planned everything. I didn’t really understand why she was wearing a bulletproof vest and then Evie hugged Shannon and thanked her…. I was able to follow everything up until that point. Well, except how Manus’ mention of sailing to Shannon was an indication that he was cheating on her with Evie. That didn’t make sense to me either but I figured I just overlooked something.
At the end of last week we were able to consider our personal understanding of scripture viewed through the historical perspective of the creation on the C of E, and the development of it’s three major traditions. This week I would like us to consider the inherent value of tradition by looking at another period in the history of the C of E when tensions were high and issues threatened its
08-14 Ghent, Belgium - St. Peter's Square
And the list goes on and on.
“Cows were sacrificed by aliens sending the White House into a panic declassified FBI files have revealed.
The aforementioned blues, then, are often where the real work comes in when it comes to remembering that it’s okay to feel a number of contradictory things at one time. See, I know that the blues are chemical. And I also know that they’ll pass – usually by the Sunday or Monday following chemo – and that I’ll start to feel a lot better, and hopefully ready to kick some ass again, before the next round. What I also know (insert groan to end all groans) is that – since there’s no end in sight to this chemo, given that it’s designed to, well, y’know, keep me here – is that this is what mine and P’s life looks like now.
And that is forever.
Adèle - Je Ne Veux Plus D'accordéon
We need to stop ignoring them. We need to get down to their level and not only "hear" them, but really hear what they are saying and address and acknowledge it. We need to respond to their first request for attention. Not their third. By putting them off, and ignoring the requests, we encourage our children to whine. The exact behavior we say we don't like.
Doubling over, Rel pressed his forehead to the cool stone and clamped his hands over his ears. He didn’t have time for this. Rissad could already be freeing himself. He clenched his teeth, lips pulled back in a silent snarl. Focus returned enough to get him back up to a sitting position. Did he need to go inside? No, the battlement would be enough. Would have to be enough; he was too close to losing his battle with the Second Realm’s logic to risk the impossible maze of the Court’s halls.
Last year dozens of people received saints to be their special patron, and there were miraculous connections. It was truly amazing. We pray that this year the Holy Spirit will again work so that all participants receive a saint that they will be able to pray to for aid throughout the entire year:
Like sharing this spicy-tangy chilli kaffir tamarind tofu dish with Simon on New Year's Eve.
THAT’S VOICEOVER! is an exciting, interactive, behind-the-scenes career event where the top talents in the voiceover industry reveal the practical steps to establishing and sustaining a career in this highly rewarding and intriguing field. Through targeted Q&A, audience participation and audition scenarios, a finely tuned and comprehensive picture is conveyed for anyone desiring to become a voiceover actor or to work in one of the supporting careers (producers, writers, directors, agents) that make up the broader industry.
handed you a
almost anything. Could you talk a bit about the different process required
Favorite quotes.
1. You reach your last day with the brilliant song that your life was meant to sing still silent within you.
'everywhere a bewildering mass of fruit blossom-apple,
I didn't really celebrate it today, my grandmothers and boyfriend visited, the rest of my family will come on friday and next week I'm throwing a big party together with my boyfriend (his birthday was 3 days ago, so we throw our parties together)!
Address: 1100 Pennsylvania Ave NW Washington, D.C.
Sign up now for our FIRST-EVER FREE Exclusive Health-D Session, where we’ll demystify health right in front of your FACE! We’ll be sharing actionable tips and zero-BS strategies on how to lose weight for REAL. It’s happening LIVE next Tuesday, May 8th at 8:00 pm Eastern Standard Time (EST).
Allow me to ask you a question; what is more impressive? (A) Breaking down musical barriers and, for better or worse, doing something that has never been done before? Or (B) working within an existing form, but nuancing it enough, so that you enhance it and evolve within it? I know that all of the Radiohead fans and virtually everyone who reads Pitchfork would pick A hands down, but I have always considered myself the traditionalist and opted for option B. On Dr. John’s Locked Down, you’re not getting anything new. It’s kind of ironic, since this is the album that will introduce Dr. John to a new generation of fans, but he’s really just doing the same thing he always has. The album is, at times, hard rock, at other times, psychedelic, and, at all times, overflowing with the flavor of New Orleans. It may be the same old tricks for a musician in his seventies, but it’s just different enough to feel like something you’ve never heard before.
But that rite of spring was upended this year. The critically endangered animals, which usually arrive in late March or early April to graze on shrimplike plankton, began arriving before Christmas, as water temperatures hovered several degrees above normal, dispersing only recently.
Honestly, I didn’t want to read this book. I didn’t want to touch it either. When I first saw the synopsis, I was like, Oh my God! It’s Mortal Instruments all over again! Don’t get me wrong, I love Mortal Instruments. I adore it! I just don’t see the point on reading a book with a kinda similar plot. And I’m not talking about the Shadow world and all that stuff. It’s the characters! It’s like a rip-off, only, they have the same author. But what the hell?! I decided to give it a shot.
Here we have a man – an experienced journalist known for his anal attitude to checking the provenance of stories – who wants his interrogators to accept that he knows the goal-difference for every team in the Premiership, but has never heard of Manchester United.
I still have not heard back from you. Please let me know if your answer is still “Dog”
Let’s Pretend
Good Friday fell on Friday the 13th in 1979, 1990, 2001. The next time it will happen is in 2063. Some think Good Friday the 13th is “good luck”, because then Easter Sunday is on April 15 which gives Americans an extra day to file taxes.
Don’t forget to come by and visit the site to check out our new look!
Yesterday was Learn Nothing Day, a holiday created by Sandra and Holly Dodd to poke a little fun at those folks who ask us questions like, "But if you don't go to school, how do you learn?"
energy for peaceful purposes,’’
They also had this printed on the front of a thong. Just FYI.
Verily, a shapely woman; to the touch like crape!
Too fast for anything but radio.
Thanks again everyone and if the 4 winners could email me their address
Congratulations Linnea!! Send me your mailing address and I will have your goodies off to you soon!!
Yep, that should do it. Given my less than stellar record of following through with New Year's Resolutions, I'll never do any of these things. And that's a good thing. You know, because of the whole reverse psychology thing. And, if by chance I keep my resolutions for the first time in my life, at least I can say that I kept my resolutions! It's a winning situation either way! See? I'm way too smart for one person.
In a small mixing bowl, whip the heavy cream to soft peaks until tips curl over.
Michelle and I actually started to measure the door with a couple dollar bills
All new brews this week include:
Now, that the list is chopped to ten we can eliminate one player from each position. The best starting five would be Derek Rose, Kobe Bryant, LeBron James, Kevin Love, and Dwight Howard. I think everyone would agree that these players are the best at their individual position, with the exception of Kevin Love. In my opinion, Love is the most underrated player in the NBA. He scores more points, grabs more rebounds, and has a better jump shot than Blake Griffin. Love is not on ESPN’s top ten plays every night like Griffin, but he is the better overall player at this point. The only other player that is not in this top five that really should be is Kevin Durant. Durant is one of the best in the league without question, but unfortunately he is not the best player at his position. If you are not the best player at your position, then you are not the best in the league.
Pigs are flying in the air; pigs are flying
Make your own nachos
We have a stand up freezer, a treadmill, a workbench, all our household paints, nostalgic items from our childhoods…
right here, on the outside
Lucy looked unsure. “Where does this train go?”
Fantasie in G major (1868)
Look for the “Florida Grass-Fed Beef” booth at the Delray GreenMarket. The vendor is Arrowhead Beef based in Chipley, Florida, and their meat comes from free-range cattle that eat a natural grass and forage diet. No hormones or antibiotics are used.
Sarah was always in a bad mood and she was stressed out a lot. Sometimes she would wonder why she took the job as governor. It was too hard, she said; there was so much going on.
Her cold hands on my forehead were a soothing change,a caress which meant home.And peace.
2010.09.05 Iraq Baghdad 12 36 Six Fedayeen attack a government building, killing a dozen Iraqis.
Of course you need to try and time your crossing of the bridge as every half hour the bridge may go up to let boats go in and out of the harbor.
Suarez (24), (28), (82)
For those of you, who have steadfastly traveled with me thus far on the road to biblical submission; probably already have a keen sense of what God plans to teach us at this junction.
Tak Matsumoto/ Composer “Theme from Ultraman” and “Never Goodbye”
Oh guess what I picked up at the beginning of the week...
“Sunpeaks also has become aware that Internet newsletters have been making unsupportable claims, inappropriate comparisons and unjustifiable common stock performance projections about the company,” the release stated.
In order to qualify as a Part 36 Offer, the offer must comply with CPR 36.2 (including (a) being in writing, (b) stating on its face it is intended to have the consequences of Section I of Part 36, and (c) specifying a period of not less than 21 days within which the defendant will be liable for the claimant’s costs if the offer is accepted). It has been held that an offer only open for 21 days does not comply – the offer must be open until withdrawn by notice appropriately served. So Cautious’s offer would not in any event have been an offer under Part 36, because it expires after 21 days. Likewise, an offer which specifies the costs consequences would not be a Part 36 Offer, as that is inconsistent with Part 36, which sets out the costs consequences.
This one is their first and last time.
Somebody’s Hero – Jamie O’Neal
following the ghost of Spanish footsteps that must have,
This deliciously warm scarf is begging for me to wear him, but many problems plague me if I were to fold.
Just for today be thankful for your many blessings
Right, of course they weren't
Transdniester refused to become part of post-Soviet Moldova as it foresaw both states being reabsorbed into Romania. Abkhazia, South Ossetia and Adjara, parts of the Georgian Soviet Socialist Republic, didn’t desire to be included in the Republic of Georgia and majority-Armenian Nagorno-Karabakh adopted a similar approach to post-Soviet Azerbaijan. The above are collectively known in certain circles as the frozen conflicts in former Soviet space.
